IMPROVING  AIR  SERVICES  TO  SMALL 

AND  RURAL  COMMUNITIES 

S.  HRG.  110–1160 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  17,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–608 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director,  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION  OPERATIONS,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Chairman 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
28 
40 
33 
1 
36 
30 

14 
16 

19 
21 

10 
12 

2 
4 

7 
9 

48 
48 
47 
46 
44 

43 

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 17, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

tion 

the National Association of Counties 

Courtney, A.A.E., Mark F., Airport Director, Lynchburg Regional Airport 

.......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Malarkey, Faye, Vice President, Legislative Affairs, Regional Airline Associa-
........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Miller,  Hon.  Karen,  Commissioner,  Boone  County,  Missouri;  on  behalf  of 
.................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Steinberg,  Hon.  Andrew  B.,  Assistant  Secretary  for  Aviation  and  Inter-
national Affairs, U.S. Department of Transportation  .......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Torgerson,  John,  Deputy  Commissioner  of  Aviation,  Alaska  Department  of 
Transportation and Public Facilities  ..................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller  IV to: 
Mark F. Courtney, A.A.E.  ................................................................................
Faye Malarkey  ..................................................................................................
Hon. Karen Miller 
............................................................................................
Hon. Andrew B. Steinberg  ...............................................................................
Regional Aviation Partners, prepared statement 
.................................................
Rockefeller  IV,  Hon.  John  D.,  U.S.  Senator  from  West  Virginia,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

IMPROVING  AIR  SERVICES  TO  SMALL 

AND  RURAL  COMMUNITIES 

TUESDAY,  JULY  17,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, SAFETY, AND 
SECURITY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:04  a.m.,  in 
room  SR–253,  Senate  Russell  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
Vice Chairman of the full Committee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Other Senators are caught in traffic and there 
was  sort  of  a  traffic  jam  coming  in  here.  I  don’t  know  if  you  know 
if there is something going on in the street out there. I had to come 
around,  come  up  Pennsylvania  Avenue  instead  of  the  regular  way. 
But  I  do  thank  you  all  for  coming  and  at  Senator  Rockefeller’s 
request,  the  Chairman’s  request,  I’m  going  to  start  this  hearing.  I 
do  thank  them  both  for  holding  this  hearing  at  my  request  and  I 
extend  a  special  welcome  to  my  great  friend,  John  Torgerson,  who 
is  here  from  Alaska.  He  is  the  Deputy  Commissioner  of  Aviation 
for our state and we appreciate him coming to testify and his inter-
est in this subject. 

Rural  air  services  are  a  vital  component  of  our  transportation 
system  in  Alaska.  We  depend  upon  aviation  more  than  any  other 
state. Seventy percent of our cities can be reached only by air year- 
round. Sometimes they can get summer travel on rivers but to have 
transportation  on  a  steady  basis,  year-round,  you  have  to  use  air 
to  70  percent  of  our  cities  and  many  of  the  villages  can  be  only 
reached  by  air,  period.  Some  of  them  are  not  on  rivers.  Instead  of 
cars and buses, we have airplanes. 

Maintaining  air  service  to  these  small  and  rural  communities 
through  Essential  Air  Service  is  a  key  product  of  deregulation  of 
the  old  CAB.  This  Committee  created  Essential  Air  Service.  In 
Alaska,  we  now  have  41  communities  that  are  served  by  Essential 
Air  Service.  They  rely  on  Essential  Air  Service  for  access  to  hos-
pitals,  mail  service,  food,  basic  supplies  and  to  transport  teams 
back and forth to play basketball. 

So  rural  air  service  funding  and  reform  is  an  annual  challenge 
for  the  Congress.  In  addition  to  finding  a  solution  for  this  funding 
for the Next Generation Air Traffic Control System, the Committee 
is also looking at innovative reforms to the overall Rural Air Serv-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

2 

ice  Program.  New  innovation  in  the  marketplace  may  hold  great 
promise  for  rural  air  service  and  there  is  great  interest  in  the 
emergence  of  very  light  jets.  These  new  aircraft  may  prove  to  be 
a  unique  opportunity  for  small  communities  of  Alaska  to  maintain 
and improve access. 

I  do  thank  you  all  for  coming.  It  is  my  hope  that  you  will  help 
us  remain  vigilant  in  funding  the  Essential  Air  Service  Program. 
It’s  literally  our  lifeline  and  a  healthy  Essential  Air  Service  Pro-
gram nationally will obviously support a good system for our cities. 
Now,  we  have  a  series  of  witnesses  today.  The  first  is  Andrew 
Steinberg,  the  Assistant  Secretary  for  Aviation  and  International 
Affairs at the Department of Transportation and let me call on you 
first, sir. 
STATEMENT  OF  HON.  ANDREW  B.  STEINBERG,  ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY  FOR  AVIATION  AND  INTERNATIONAL  AFFAIRS, 
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Mr. STEINBERG. Thank you, Mr. Co-Chairman. I appreciate being 
invited  to  the  hearing.  I’d  like  to  ask  that  my  written  statement 
be made part of the record. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  thank  you  for  reminding  me.  All  your 
statements  will  appear  in  the  record  as  so  read  and  we’re  not  lim-
iting your testimony but we hope you’ll make it short but I’m sure 
the  other  Senators  will  be  along  and  we’ll  be  happy  to  have  your 
statement. But all of your statements will be printed in full in the 
record. 

Mr.  STEINBERG.  Thank  you,  Senator.  In  light  of  that,  I’d  like  to 
just  focus  on  three  key  points,  if  I  could,  over  the  next  5  minutes. 
First,  why  smaller  communities  in  the  U.S.  have  difficulty  attract-
ing  and  retaining  commercial  airline  service;  second,  whether  our 
existing  programs,  specifically  the  Essential  Air  Service  Program 
and  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development  Program, 
SCASDP, offer the right approach; and third, going to the point you 
just  made,  Senator  Stevens,  how  can  we  improve  the  situation  per 
new, creative solutions? 

So first, the nature of the problem, I think, is actually relatively 
clear. Scheduled air transportation depends on predictable demand 
that produces enough traffic to achieve break-even passenger loads 
on each flight and because point-to-point service typically does best 
on a scheduled basis only in very large markets, scheduled airlines 
can  serve  smaller  communities  economically,  usually  only  as  part 
of an overall network, such as a hub-and-spoke system. 

These  systems  work  because  what  they  do  is  aggregate  demand 
from many spoke cities, if you will and connect passengers at a hub 
to  various  destinations.  What  this  means  is  that  the  most  profit-
able hub is the one that can—the most profitable spoke city, excuse 
me, is the one that contributes the most to the overall network. In 
general, cities with fewer passengers are the least profitable spokes 
and  importantly  I  think  they  are,  the  first  to  be  eliminated  when 
network carriers downsize their hubs. 

Cost  trends  right  now  for  service  to  smaller  airports  are  not  fa-
vorable. With the shift of regional airlines to larger aircraft, the in-
crease  in  fuel  costs  and  equipage  requirements  created  by  the 
FAA’s  Commuter  Safety  Rule,  service  to  smaller  communities  has 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

3 

only  gotten  more  expensive.  So  as  legacy  carriers,  particularly  in 
the  lower  48,  lost  some  $35  billion  from  2001  to  2007.  They  elimi-
nated spokes that contributed the least to their networks, many in 
smaller communities. And as you know, as a result of all that, the 
EAS Program, particularly in the lower 48, grew significantly. 

So my first point is really an observation, which is that we won’t 
ever have the kind of comprehensive scheduled service we’d like to 
smaller communities unless we have healthy network airlines that 
are  growing  their  systems  to  go  to  new  places  rather  than  shrink-
ing their domestic capacity. 

Second,  as  to  our  existing  programs,  EAS  and  SCASDP—let  me 
say at the outset, whatever should happen with reauthorization, we 
will  always  administer  these  programs  as  effectively  as  possible, 
recognizing that we’re dealing with important transportation needs 
of  real  people.  In  fact,  the  vast  majority  of  my  staff  that  works  on 
domestic  aviation  is  already  devoted  to  administering  these  two 
programs. 

Despite this commitment, I think it’s hard to argue that certainly 
outside of places like Alaska, which has special circumstances that 
these  programs  have  been  effective  in  addressing  the  needs  of 
small  communities.  As  you  probably  know,  the  EAS  Program  has 
not  changed  in  a  fundamental  way  for  three  decades,  even  as  the 
industry,  of  course,  has  changed  quite  significantly.  So  what  we 
have  today  is  an  EAS  Program  that  really  is  more  of  a  safety  net, 
if  you  will,  for  smaller  communities  and  what  history  tells  us  is 
that  once  a  community  receives  a  subsidy  for  air  service,  it’s  rel-
atively unusual for an air carrier to come in and provide service on 
an unsubsidized basis. 

As  to  SCASDP,  I  think  it’s  probably  too  early  to  pass  a  final 
judgment. As you know, we’re waiting on a report from our Inspec-
tor General about its effectiveness. I would note that the GAO has 
found  that  improvements  from  SCASDP  grants  have  not—have 
been self-sustaining less than half of the time, which is not encour-
aging. 

The  third  point  I  wanted  to  cover  is  the  issue  of  whether  there 
are solutions that can help improve the level and quality of service, 
and I think any solution has to deal with the fundamental problem 
that  I  mentioned  at  the  outset  and  that  is  insufficient  demand  to 
support  scheduled  service  purely  on  market  terms.  As  you  men-
tioned,  Senator,  recent  technological  advances  with  very  light  jets 
represent  a  breakthrough.  They  are  important  because  they  rep-
resent  a  radial  reduction  in  aircraft  operating  economics  over  the 
long term. 

Equally  important  is  information  technology  that  allows  carriers 
to  aggregate  demand  on  a  non-scheduled  basis  over  the  Internet 
and if you combine the two, you can have, potentially a very power-
ful, on-demand air taxi service developing in some of these smaller 
communities.  It’s  already  beginning  to  happen,  not  with  very  light 
jets because those have yet to be delivered. But there is a company 
I’d  point  out  called  SATS  Air,  which  is  based  in  Greenville,  South 
Carolina  and  is  already  making  air  taxi  services  available  across 
much  of  the  southeast  U.S.  with  comfortable,  safe  turboprop  air-
craft and rates that are quite competitive, certainly with coach, full 
coach fares. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

4 

So let me wrap up there and just say that we are absolutely com-
mitted  to  working  with  this  Committee  and  your  staff  on  ways  to 
improve small community service. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Steinberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ANDREW B. STEINBERG, ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR 

AVIATION AND INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  this  hearing.  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity to discuss with you and the Subcommittee two programs administered by the 
Department  of  Transportation  that  affect  air  service  to  small  communities,  namely 
the Essential Air Service (EAS) program and the Small Community Air Service De-
velopment  Program.  I  can  assure  you  that  the  Department  is  committed  to  imple-
menting  its  small  community  air  service  programs  in  the  best  and  most  efficient 
manner  and  thereby  help  smaller  communities  meet  the  challenges  that  they  face 
in obtaining and retaining air service. 

It is clear that air service in this country has changed dramatically over the past 
several  years.  Many  of  these  changes  have  been  very  positive.  The  growth  of  low- 
fare  carriers,  for  example,  has  made  affordable  air  transportation  available  to  mil-
lions  of  people  across  the  country.  The  number  of  air  travelers  has  expanded  dra-
matically,  as  hundreds  of  passengers  have  taken  advantage  of  the  low  fares  that 
have  become  more  widely  available.  While  this  is  a  good  development  overall  for 
consumers,  we  recognize  that  it  can  create  new  challenges  for  some  small  commu-
nities. With a greater number of service choices available, particularly those involv-
ing lower fares, many consumers are willing to drive to places with a broader array 
of  air  service  options,  making  it  more  difficult  for  some  individual  airports  to  sus-
tain  their  own  traffic  levels.  There  are,  for  example,  some  communities  receiving 
EAS  assistance  within  ready  driving  distance  of  two  or  three  major  airports.  This 
can  result  in  a  struggling  community  airport,  but  not  necessarily  consumers  who 
lack  access  to  the  national  air  transportation  system.  Let  me  give  you  an  example, 
just a few years ago Utica, New York generated about 24,000 passengers a year and 
was served profitably without EAS subsidy. Then Southwest began flying to Albany 
and JetBlue started service to Syracuse—both of which are near to Utica. The num-
ber of passengers using Utica airport fell to 3,500, and the Federal Government was 
paying over $1 million in EAS subsidy in attempt to compete with low-fare, jet serv-
ice in nearby cities. The subsidy per passenger finally exceeded the $200 statutorily- 
determined ceiling thus ending the community’s eligibility for EAS. 

Another challenge is the change in aircraft used by carriers that serve small com-
munities.  Many  commuter  carriers  have  been  replacing  their  19-seat  aircraft  with 
30-seat aircraft, due to the increased costs of operating the smaller planes and larg-
er carriers’ reluctance to offer code sharing on 19-seaters. This trend began at least 
10  years  ago  and  has  continued.  There  are  now  fewer  and  fewer  19-seat  aircraft  in 
operation  as  many  carriers  have  upgauged  to  30-seat  aircraft,  and,  in  some  cases, 
even  regional  jets.  As  a  result,  many  small  communities  that  cannot  support  this 
larger size of aircraft are being left without air service. Additionally, the rise in the 
cost  of  aviation  fuel  has  made  all  carriers  more  cost-conscious  and  more  selective 
in  initiating  new  service  and  maintaining  service  where  yields  and  traffic  are  low. 
Also, some changes have occurred in response to the terrorist attacks of September 
11, 2001. Many consumers, leisure and business, have changed their travel patterns 
and  carriers  have  altered  the  structure  of  their  airline  services  in  both  large  and 
small markets. 

The  recent  financial  difficulties  of  the  network  carriers  have  contributed  to  the 
dearth  of  air  service  to  small  communities.  As  network-airlines  have  worked  hard 
to  cut  costs  and  become  more  efficient  in  order  to  weather  very  difficult  economic 
conditions,  they  have  resorted  to  canceling  service  on  their  thinnest  routes—many 
of which are small communities. Thus in the long-term, an important factor for com-
prehensive  air  transportation  in  the  United  States  is  the  sound  financial  health  of 
network airlines. 

The challenge that we face is one of adjusting the programs, to the extent we are 
able, to account for these changes in an efficient and effective manner, giving appro-
priate and balanced recognition to the reasonable needs of the communities, the car-
riers, the consumers, and the taxpaying public at large. Mr. Chairman, I do not use 
the  word  ‘‘challenge’’  lightly.  All  of  us—the  Federal  Government  that  manages  pro-
grams affecting service at small communities, as well as the states and the commu-
nities  themselves—need  to  reexamine  the  way  we  approach  small  community  air 
service. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

5 

We at the Department of Transportation have recognized for a while now that the 
way  the  Federal  Government  helps  small  communities  has  not  kept  pace  with  the 
changes  in  the  industry  and  the  way  service  is  now  provided  in  this  country.  For 
that  reason,  we  have  initiated  some  important  reevaluations  of  the  programs  that 
we  manage.  I  want  to  share  with  you  today  what  we  have  done  and  are  doing  to 
address this issue. 

As  you  know,  the  Department  administers  two  programs  dealing  with  air  service 
at small communities. The EAS program provides subsidies to air carriers to provide 
air service at certain statutorily-mandated communities. The Small Community Air 
Service  Development  Program,  which  was  established  by  Congress  in  2000  under 
the AIR–21 legislation, provides Federal grants-in-aid to help small communities ad-
dress  their  air  service  and  airfare  issues.  While  initially  established  as  a  pilot  pro-
gram, it was reauthorized through FY 2008 in Vision 100. 
Essential Air Service Program 

Let me first address the EAS program. The laws governing our administration of 
the  EAS  program  have  not  changed  significantly  since  its  inception  28  years  ago, 
notwithstanding the dramatic changes that have taken place in the airline industry. 
As  currently  structured,  the  EAS  program  acts  only  as  a  safety  net  for  small  com-
munities receiving subsidized air service by providing threshold levels of air service. 
While  ensuring  some  service,  this  approach  does  little  to  help  communities  attract 
self-sustaining unsubsidized air service, as evidenced by the fact that once a commu-
nity  receives  subsidized  air  service  it  is  rare  for  an  air  carrier  to  come  in  offering 
to provide unsubsidized air service. 

The  goal  of  our  proposed  changes  to  the  EAS  program  is  to  focus  the  program’s 
resources on the most isolated communities, i.e., those with the fewest driving alter-
natives.  Our  current  proposal  to  accomplish  this  is  quite  different  from  those  made 
in past years. The first change we propose is to cap EAS communities at those that 
currently  receive  subsidized  air  service.  Second,  we  would  rank  all  the  subsidized 
communities  by  isolation,  i.e.,  by  driving  miles  to  the  nearest  large  or  medium  hub 
airport,  with  the  most  isolated  getting  service  first.  Last,  we  are  proposing  a  max-
imum $50 million funding level. 

Congress  has  also  recognized  the  need  for  reform  and  created  a  few  pilot  pro-
grams  in  Vision  100.  One  program  is  the  Community  Flexibility  Pilot  Program.  It 
allows  up  to  ten  communities  to  receive  a  grant  equal  to  2  years’  worth  of  subsidy 
in  exchange  for  their  forgoing  their  EAS  for  10  years.  The  funds  would  have  to  be 
used  for  a  project  on  the  airport  property  or  to  improve  the  facilities  for  general 
aviation,  but  no  communities  have  volunteered  for  that  program.  Another  program 
is  the  Alternate  Essential  Air  Service  Program.  The  thrust  of  this  program  is  that, 
instead of paying an air carrier to serve a community as we typically do under EAS, 
communities  could  apply  to  receive  the  funds  directly—provided  that  they  have  a 
plan  as  to  exactly  how  they  would  use  the  funds  to  the  benefit  of  the  communities’ 
access  to  air  service.  The  law  gives  great  flexibility  in  that  regard.  For  example, 
funds  could  be  used  for  smaller  aircraft  but  more  frequent  service,  for  on-demand 
air taxi service, for on-demand surface transportation, for regionalized service, or to 
purchase an aircraft to be used to serve the community. The Department issued an 
order establishing that program in the summer of 2004, but to date no communities 
have applied. I cannot tell you for sure why, but my guess is that part of it is that 
it is just human nature to resist both risk and change. 

With  regard  to  the  EAS  program,  it  is  important  to  note  the  continued  growth 
of the program’s size and cost to taxpayers over time. As a point of reference, before 
the  terrorist  attacks  of  September  11,  the  Department  was  paying  subsidy  for  107 
communities  (including  32  in  Alaska).  We  are  now  subsidizing  service  at  145  com-
munities (including 41 in Alaska). Further, EAS is often viewed as an absolute enti-
tlement whether the communities invest any time and effort in supporting the serv-
ice  or  not.  We  have  proposed  reforms  to  EAS  to  better  focus  its  resources  on  the 
most isolated communities. 
Small Community Air Service Development Program 

The  Department  is  now  in  its  sixth  year  of  administering  the  Small  Community 
Air Service Development Program (Small Community Program). Under the law, the 
Department  can  make  a  maximum  of  40  grants  in  each  fiscal  year  to  address  air 
service  and  airfare  issues,  although  no  more  than  four  grants  each  year  can  be  in 
any  one  state.  Until  2006,  Congress  had  provided  $20  million  in  each  year  for  this 
program.  In  2006,  the  funding  for  the  program  was  $10  million,  and  the  Revised 
Continuing  Appropriations  Resolution,  2007  (Pub.  L.  110–5),  provides  the  Depart-
ment with $10 million in Fiscal Year 2007 to administer the Small Community Pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

6 

gram. On February 26, the Department issued a Request for Proposals for 2007 ap-
plications and proposals are due April 27. 

Given  the  many  and  varying  priorities  facing  the  Department,  this  program  was 
not  accommodated  within  the  President’s  2008  budget.  Nonetheless,  it  is  important 
to  note  the  extensive  support  that  the  Department  provides  for  small  airports  in 
terms  of  supporting  the  infrastructure  that  make  any  service  possible.  In  the  last 
2 years (FY 2005 and FY 2006), the FAA has provided over $4 billion in grants for 
small  airports,  or  nearly  2⁄3 of  the  Airport  Improvement  Program  (AIP).  Further-
more,  the  Department’s  reauthorization  proposal  would  continue  to  direct  AIP  to 
small  airports.  The  reauthorization  proposal  would  also  add  new  AIP  eligibility  for 
ADS–B  ground  stations  and  expanded  eligibility  for  revenue  producing  projects  at 
small airports that will help their financial stability. 

With  respect  to  the  Small  Community  Program,  the  Department  has  made  many 
awards  to  communities  throughout  the  country  and  authorized  a  wide  variety  of 
projects,  seeking  to  address  the  diverse  types  of  problems  presented  and  test  dif-
ferent ideas about how to solve them. Some of these projects include a new business 
model to provide ground handling for carriers at the airport to reduce station costs, 
seed money for a new airline to provide regional service, expansion of low-fare serv-
ices, a ground service transportation alternative for access to the Nation’s air trans-
portation  system,  aggressive  marketing  and  promotional  campaigns  to  increase  rid-
ership at airports, and revenue guarantees, subsidies, and other financial incentives 
to reduce the risk to airlines of initiating or expanding service at a community. For 
the most part, these projects extend over a period of two to 4 years. 

This  program  differs  from  the  traditional  EAS  program  in  a  number  of  respects. 
First, the funds go to the communities rather than directly to an airline serving the 
community. Second, the financial assistance is not limited to air carrier subsidy, but 
can be used for a number of other efforts to enhance a community’s service, includ-
ing  advertising  and  promotional  activities,  studies,  and  ground  service  initiatives. 
Third, communities design their own solutions to their air service and airfare prob-
lems and seek financial assistance under the program to help them implement their 
plans. 

Over  the  past  5  years,  the  Department  has  made  more  than  180  grant  awards. 
Overall,  more  than  90  percent  of  the  grant  recipients  have  implemented  their  au-
thorized projects. 

For  example,  new  services  have  been  inaugurated  at  many  communities;  others 
have  received  increased  frequencies  or  service  with  larger  aircraft.  Several  commu-
nities have begun targeted and comprehensive marketing campaigns to increase use 
of  the  service  at  the  local  airport  and  to  attract  additional  air  carrier  service.  We 
have  been  monitoring  the  progress  of  all  of  the  communities  as  they  proceed  with 
the  implementation  of  their  projects.  However,  because  the  majority  of  the  projects 
involve activities over a two-to-four-year period, and many communities have sought 
and  received  extensions  for  their  grants,  only  now  are  some  of  them  at  the  point 
of completion. 

As  you  know,  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  concluded  a  review  of 
the  Small  Community  Program  in  2005.  GAO  too  recognized  that  it  is  difficult  to 
draw any firm conclusions as to the effectiveness of the Small Community Program 
in helping communities address their service issues because many grant projects are 
still  in  process.  Of  the  grant  projects  that  had  been  completed,  the  GAO  concluded 
that the results were mixed because not all of the grants resulted in improvements 
that were achieved and sustained after the grant funding was exhausted. 

In  this  regard,  since  the  end  of  March  2007,  the  Department’s  Inspector  General 
(IG)  has  been  reviewing  the  outcomes  of  the  limited  number  of  projects  that  have 
been completed to date. Evaluation of the program will consist of two phases includ-
ing  a  quantitative  and  qualitative  analysis  of  a  selected  sample  of  all  completed 
projects. 

The  Federal  Government,  however,  is  only  one  piece  of  the  equation.  States  and 
communities will also need to review their air service in the context of the changed 
industry  structure  and  service  patterns  to  seek  fresh,  new  solutions  to  maximize 
their air service potential, including regional and intermodal approaches and expan-
sion of public-private partnerships to meet these challenges. 

The  fundamental  problem  with  air  service  to  many  small  communities  is  insuffi-
cient  demand  to  justify  scheduled  service  purely  on  market  terms.  However,  recent 
technological  advances  may  offer  a  new  market  solution  to  the  problems  of  small 
community air service. The most dramatic innovation is the Very Light Jet (or VLJ) 
which  represents  a  breakthrough  in  jet  aircraft  operating  economics.  Another  very 
important  innovation  is  information  technology  that  allows  demand  for  air  service 
to  be  aggregated  over  the  Internet.  The  combination  of  VLJ  with  Internet-enabled 
information  technology  could  potentially  facilitate  the  provision  of  on-demand,  jet 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

7 

air taxi service at these small communities. Companies such as DayJet have already 
begun operations employing these technologies. 

In  that  regard,  our  office  looks  forward  to  continuing  discussions  with  your  staff 
on finding ways to better enable the marketplace to supply air service to small com-
munities. We have discussed a range of ideas that carriers could consider, including 
new  per-seat,  on-demand  service  business  models  using  the  new  generation  of  very 
light  jets  (VLJ)  as  well  as  alternative  ways  to  create  market-based  incentives  for 
airlines to add and sustain service to small communities. 

In closing, Mr. Chairman, let me reaffirm the Department’s commitment to imple-
menting the DOT’s small community air service programs in the best and most effi-
cient  manner.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  the  members  of  this  sub-
committee  and  the  full  Committee  as  we  continue  to  work  toward  these  objectives. 
Thank you again. This concludes my prepared statement. I will be happy to answer 
any of your questions. 

Senator  STEVENS.  We’ll  get  back  and  do  some  questions  before 
we conclude. Mr. Torgerson, if I may have your statement, please? 
STATEMENT  OF  JOHN  TORGERSON,  DEPUTY  COMMISSIONER 
OF  AVIATION,  ALASKA  DEPARTMENT  OF  TRANSPORTATION 
AND PUBLIC FACILITIES 
Mr.  TORGERSON.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens.  It’s  always  great 
to  see  again.  You  have  requested  testimony  on  the  U.S.  Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  Essential  Air  Service  and  its  effects  on 
Alaska. 

My  name  is  John  Torgerson,  Deputy  Commissioner  of  Aviation 
for the state. I’d like to first place the size of Alaska in perspective. 
If  you  were  to  fly  from  Washington,  D.C.  to  San  Diego,  California 
and then from Minneapolis, Minnesota to Houston, Texas, that dis-
tance  crisscrossing  America  is  actually  less  than  if  you  flew  in 
Alaska east to west and north to south. Our capital City of Juneau 
is the only capital city in the United States accessible only by plane 
or boat. 

Twenty-five percent of all Alaskans and 46 percent of all Alaskan 
Natives live in communities of less than 1,000 people. To cover this 
area, we only have 4,732 miles of paved road. 

The  State  of  Alaska  owns  and  operates  258  airports,  ranging  in 
class  from  the  large  international  to  the  small  rural  community 
class. Of the airports, 47 are paved, 173 are gravel of which 72 are 
less  than  3,000  feet.  Thirty-seven  are  seaplane  facilities  and  one  a 
heliport. 

I’d like to direct the balance of my testimony to the last GAO re-
port  on  Essential  Air  Service.  The  GAO  acknowledged  that  the 
need to make difficult decisions to sustain the Essential Air Service 
Program at the current funding levels. The report outlined four rec-
ommendations and I’d like to address each of those separately. 

Alaskan  communities  receiving  Essential  Air  Service  are  the 
most  remote  in  the  Nation.  Alaska  has  40  communities  receiving 
EAS.  Of  those  40,  only  6  are  connected  to  a  road  system.  Of  that 
6 on the road system, all are more than 100 miles from a hub air-
port.  These  100  miles  to  the  nearest  hub  airport  are  not  on  an 
interstate  highway  or  even  a  paved  two-lane  highway  but  mainly 
narrow gravel roads. 

Thirty-four  of  the  communities  receiving  the  Essential  Air  Serv-
ice  subsidies  in  Alaska  do  not  even  have  a  gravel  road.  They  are 
completely  isolated  from  the  road  system  and  rely  on  air  travel  as 
the  primary  means  of  transportation  and  access  to  basic  services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

8 

In  many  of  our  rural  communities,  air  transportation  is  the  only 
viable method of connecting to the outside world. Alaska meets and 
exceeds the remoteness recommendations of the GAO report. 

The concept of matching aircraft capacity with community use is 
exemplified  in  the  type  of  aircraft  utilized  in  Alaska.  A  seven-pas-
senger  Grumman  Goose,  an  aircraft  last  manufactured  in  1947, 
provides  residents  of  Akutan  in  the  eastern  Aleutian  Islands  with 
regular  Essential  Air  Service.  Other  communities  rely  on  smaller 
aircraft,  such  as  the  Cessna  185s  and  the  Cessna  206s,  capable  of 
carrying just three to five passengers. 

Only  6  of  the  40  Alaska  communities  qualifying  for  EAS  are 
served by jets. In these cases, jet service is justified by population, 
freight needs and the distance from medium-sized hubs. For exam-
ple,  the  island  community  of  Adak  has  jet  service  to  Anchorage, 
1,300  miles  away.  Not  one  of  the  six  airports  receiving  jet  service 
is  connected  to  the  road  system.  As  already  stated,  the  remaining 
communities  are  served  by  the  smallest  aircraft  in  commercial 
service.  Alaska  is  already  conforming  to  this  recommendation  of 
matching aircraft capacity to communities. 

In  Alaska,  the  idea  of  consolidating  at  regional  airports  and 
using the spoke and hub system is already in place. One half of the 
EAS  communities  in  Alaska  are  small,  remote  communities  with 
populations of less than 100 residents. Alaska’s Essential Air Serv-
ice  subsidy  already  utilizes  small  carrier  flying  light  transport—I 
lost a page. Pardon me. I thought I lost it completely. 

In Alaska, the idea of consolidating these into regional spoke and 
hub  methods  is  already  in  place.  Alaska’s  Essential  Air  Service 
subsidy already utilizes small aircraft to transport passengers from 
small,  rural  communities  to  regional  hub  airports  where  pas-
sengers  can  access  basic  services  and  links  to  the  national  trans-
portation system. 

The  fourth  recommendation  is  to  change  carrier  subsidies 
through  local  grants.  Of  the  40  Alaskan  communities  currently  re-
ceiving the Essential Air Service, only 11 have formed a municipal 
government. The majority of our communities receiving this service 
have  not  formed  an  entity  that  could  apply  for,  administer  or  pro-
vide a local match, making this recommendation difficult. 

Alaskans  believe  the  program  is  working  well  and  request  no 
changes of the current funding method. We believe the current pro-
gram  is  well  administered  by  USDOT  and  works  effectively  in 
Alaska. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  Essential  Air  Service  Program  has  been  very 
successful  in  our  state.  Over  the  last  3  years,  the  funds  allocated 
under this program to air carriers has increased less than the gen-
eral rate of inflation, despite higher fuel costs, insurance rates and 
personnel costs. 

During  this  same  period  of  time,  the  total  number  of  passengers 
usually  in  the  EAS  in  Alaska  has  increased.  I  believe  this  is  be-
cause  the  Alaska  Program  already  utilizes  the  cost  saving  meas-
ures  recommended  in  the  2002  GAO  report.  The  Essential  Air 
Service  Program  provides  a  vital  link  to  many  Alaskan  commu-
nities that would otherwise not receive air service. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  and  I 

look forward to any questions you might have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

9 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Torgerson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN TORGERSON, DEPUTY COMMISSIONER OF AVIATION, 

ALASKA DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES 

Good morning, Mr. Chairman and Committee members. 
You have requested testimony on the U.S. Department of Transportation’s Essen-

tial Air Service program and its effects on Alaska. 

My name is John Torgerson, Deputy Commissioner of Aviation for the Alaska De-
partment  of  Transportation.  I  have  resided  in  Alaska  since  1950  as  a  homesteader, 
rural  resident,  businessman,  State  Senator  and  now  as  the  Deputy  Commissioner 
of Aviation. 

The size of Alaska is better understood if you were to fly from Washington, D.C., 
to San Diego, California, and then from Minneapolis, Minnesota, to Houston, Texas. 
That distance crisscrossing America is actually less than if you flew across Alaska 

from east to west and north to south. 

craft. 

by plane or boat. 

communities of less than 1,000 people. 

• Our capital Juneau is the only capital city in the United States accessible only 
• Twenty-five  percent  of  all  Alaskans  and  46  percent  of  Alaskan  Natives  live  in 
• One-quarter  of  all  Alaskans  live  in  communities  accessible  only  by  boat  or  air-
• There are only 4,732 miles of paved road in Alaska. 
The  State  of  Alaska  owns  and  operates  258  airports  ranging  in  class  from  the 
large  international  to  the  small  rural  community  class.  Of  the  airports,  47  are 
paved,  173  are  gravel  (or  which  72  runways  are  less  than  3,000  feet),  37  are  sea-
plane  facilities  and  1  is  a  heliport.  The  airports  operated  by  the  state  are  truly  es-
sential  because  air  travel  is  the  primary  means  of  transportation  to  these  commu-
nities. Air travel is not a luxury in Alaska or a convenience; it is a critical transpor-
tation mode that provides basic day-to-day necessities. 
GAO Findings 

I  would  like  to  direct  the  balance  of  my  testimony  to  the  last  GAO  report  on  the 
Essential  Air  Service  program.  The  GAO  acknowledged  the  need  to  make  ‘‘difficult 
decisions’’  to  sustain  the  Essential  Air  Service  program  at  current  funding  levels. 
The report outlined four specific recommendations, and I will address each of these 
recommendations separately. 
1. Targeting More Remote Communities 

Alaskan  communities  receiving  Essential  Air  Service  are  the  most  remote  in  the 
Nation.  Alaska  has  40  communities  receiving  EAS.  Of  those  40,  only  six  are  con-
nected  to  a  road  system.  Of  the  six  that  are  on  the  road  system,  all  are  more  than 
100  miles  from  a  hub  airport.  Those  100  miles  to  the  nearest  hub  airport  are  not 
on  an  interstate  highway  or  even  a  paved  two-lane  highway,  but  mainly  narrow 
gravel roads. 

Thirty-four of the communities receiving Essential Air Service subsidies in Alaska 
do not even have a gravel road. They are completely isolated from the road system, 
and rely on air travel as their primary means of transportation and access to basic 
services.  In  many  of  our  rural  communities,  air  transportation  is  the  only  viable 
method  of  connecting  to  the  outside  world.  Alaska  meets  and  exceeds  the  remote-
ness recommendations of the GAO report. 
2. Match Capacity (Aircraft Size) With Community Use 

The  concept  of  matching  aircraft  capacity  with  community  use  is  exemplified  in 
the  type  of  aircraft  utilized  in  Alaska.  A  7-passenger  Grumman  Goose,  an  aircraft 
last manufactured in 1947, provides residents of Akutan in the eastern Aleutian Is-
lands with regular Essential Air Service. Other communities rely on smaller aircraft 
such  as  Cessna  185s  and  Cessna  206s,  capable  of  carrying  just  three  to  five  pas-
sengers. 

Only six of the 40 Alaskan communities qualifying for EAS are served by jet air-
craft. In these cases, jet service is justified by population, freight needs and the dis-
tance  from  medium-size  hubs.  For  example,  the  island  community  of  Adak  has  jet 
service to Anchorage 1,300 miles away. Not one of the six airports receiving jet serv-
ice is connected to a road system. As already stated, the remaining communities are 
served by some of the smallest aircraft in commercial service. Alaska is already con-
forming to this recommendation of matching aircraft capacity to community use. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

10 

3. Consolidate Multiple Communities Into Regional Airports 

In  Alaska,  the  idea  of  consolidating  at  regional  airports  or  using  the  spoke-and- 
hub  system  is  already  in  place.  One-half  of  the  EAS  communities  in  Alaska  are 
small, remote communities, with populations of less than 100 residents. Alaska’s Es-
sential  Air  Service  subsidy  already  utilizes  small  carriers  flying  light  aircraft  to 
transport  passengers  from  these  small  rural  communities  to  regional  hub  airports, 
where passengers can access basic services and links to the national transportation 
system. 
4. Change to Local Grant Program 

The  fourth  recommendation  is  to  change  carrier  subsidies  to  local  grants.  Of  the 
40  Alaskan  communities  currently  receiving  Essential  Air  Service  funding,  only  11 
have  formed  a  municipal  government.  The  majority  of  our  communities  receiving 
this  service  are  not  incorporated  as  a  municipal  entity  that  could  apply  for,  admin-
ister  or  provide  a  local  match,  making  this  recommendation  difficult  to  implement. 
Alaskans believe the program is working well and request no change to the current 
funding method. We believe the current program is well administered by the United 
States Department of Transportation and works efficiently in Alaska. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  Essential  Air  Service  program  has  been  very  successful  in 
Alaska. Over the past 3 years the funds allocated under this program to Alaska air 
carriers  has  increased  less  that  the  general  rate  of  inflation—despite  much  higher 
fuel costs, insurance rates and personnel costs. During this same period of time, the 
total  number  of  passengers  utilizing  EAS  in  Alaska  has  increased.  I  believe  this  is 
because the Alaska program already utilizes the cost-saving measures recommended 
in the 2002 GAO report. 

The Essential Air Service program provides a vital link to many Alaskan commu-

nities that would otherwise not receive air service. 

Thank  you  for  allowing  me  to  testify,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  ques-

tions that the Committee might have. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you—next  witness  is  Karen  Miller,  the 
Boone County Commissioner of Aviation, representing the National 
Association of Counties from Columbia, Missouri, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAREN MILLER, COMMISSIONER, BOONE 
COUNTY,  MISSOURI;  ON  BEHALF  OF  THE  NATIONAL 
ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES 
Ms. MILLER. Good morning, Senator Stevens. My name is Karen 
Miller  and  I  am  a  County  Commissioner  in  Boone  County,  Mis-
souri.  I  am  here  representing  the  National  Association  of  Counties 
known  as  NACo.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  testify 
on improving air service to small and rural communities. 

Essential  Air  Service  is  extremely  important  to  NACo  members 
in small and rural communities, to Boone County, Missouri and to 
the  approximately  143  other  rural  communities  served  by  EAS  in 
36 states. 

Columbia  Regional  Airport,  located  in  Boone  County,  Missouri 
began  receiving  Essential  Air  Service  in  October  2006  when  Trans 
States  Airlines  pulled  out  of  the  market.  Senator  Stevens,  please 
note  that  this  occurred  not  because  of  a  decrease  in  enplanements 
but because Trans States decided to change from turboprop planes 
to regional, making Columbia not economically viable to serve. We 
have  a  strong  business  community  that  is  always  looking  for  more 
employers.  Believe  when  I  say,  one  of  the  first  questions  we  get 
from businesses looking to relocate in our area is, ‘‘how far are you 
from  a  commercial  airport?’’  It  dramatically  improves  our  competi-
tiveness to say 10 miles versus 115 miles to St. Louis or 135 miles 
to Kansas City. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

11 

While  having  EAS  service  has  been  important  to  our  region,  the 
result  of  the  change  from  non-subsidized  to  subsidized  service  has 
not  been  without  challenges  and  we  have  seen  a  reduction  in 
enplanements—from  almost  20,000  in  2005  to  13,673  in  2006  to  a 
projected  level  of  less  than  10,000  in  2007.  Until  July  7,  2007,  Co-
lumbia received four EAS flights per day during the week and two 
flights  per  day  on  the  weekends,  all  provided  by  Air  Midwest.  The 
flights were evenly split between Kansas City and St. Louis. 

Due  to  the  unreliability  of  the  flights  and  the  schedule,  we 
agreed  to  a  change  in  service.  Effective  July  8th,  all  these  flights 
now  go  to  Kansas  City  where  Air  Midwest  has  its  own  gate  and 
maintenance  operation.  We  are  hopeful  that  moving  all  flights  to 
Kansas  City  will  improve  reliability,  making  our  service  more  at-
tractive and increase enplanements. 

NACo  has  a  number  of  suggestions  for  improving  the  Essential 
Air  Service  Program.  The  goal  of  a  number  of  these  recommenda-
tions  is  to  build  up  the  enplanements  in  a  community  so  that  car-
riers  can  offer  service  without  an  EAS  subsidy.  There  needs  to  be 
more funding. We applaud the Commerce Committee for increasing 
EAS funding to $133 million. 

Like any other product or service, EAS has to be attractive to the 
customer.  Hopefully  with  more  funds,  the  issues  often  raised  by 
EAS  communities  concerning  frequency,  convenience  and  type  of 
aircraft can be addressed. 

We  also  ask  this  Subcommittee  to  help  identify  an  additional 
dedicated  or  guaranteed  source  of  revenue  for  the  EAS  program. 
While the international over flight fee generates $50 million annu-
ally  for  EAS,  the  remainder  currently  has  to  come  from  the  Gen-
eral Fund and this creates an uncertainty for the communities and 
the  air  carriers.  An  additional  dependable  source,  such  as  the  Air-
port  and  Airway  Trust  Fund  would  assures  communities  and  air 
carriers  that  the  program  will  be  fully  funded,  making  EAS  a 
stronger program. 

Another  option  would  be  to  require  the  Trust  Fund  to  help  fund 
EAS  to  the  extent  that  the  over  flight  fee  and  General  Fund  con-
tributions failed to reach the fully authorized level. 

We believe the Local Participation Program, currently in law but 
never  implemented,  which  requires  a  10  percent  match  require-
ment  in  ten  communities  should  be  repealed.  Many  of  the  small 
and  rural  communities  that  would  be  required  to  provide  a  local 
match  are  not  able  to  find  the  tens  of  thousands  of  dollars  the 
match would require. 

Additionally,  the  $200  subsidy  cap  should  be  increased  and  in-
dexed.  It  has  been  in  place  since  1989  and  while  we  are  not  op-
posed  to  the  concept  of  a  cap,  one  that  hasn’t  been  changed  in  18 
years needs adjustment. 

We  believe  that  there  needs  to  be  either  an  incentive  for  im-
proved service or a penalty for those air carriers who provide unre-
liable  service.  Section  405  of  Senate  bill  1300  moves  in  the  right 
direction  but  we  would  recommend  requiring  the  Secretary  of 
Transportation  to  provide  incentives  for  carriers  to  improve  air 
service,  as  opposed  to  this  being  discretionary,  and  include  pen-
alties for poor service. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

12 

There needs to be more marketing of EAS service to the commu-
nity. NACo supports the provision now included in Senate bill 1300 
requiring  airlines  who  are  bidding  on  EAS  service  to  include  a 
funded marketing plan in their proposal. 

One  final  suggestion  to  improve  EAS  service  is  that  we  need  to 
study  approaches  to  encouraging  more  airlines  to  bid  on  providing 
EAS service. More competition may result in better service. 

As I conclude, let me also indicate NACo’s support for the Small 
Community Air Service Development Program. This program needs 
to be funded at a level that comes close to meeting the demand and 
the  $35  million  annual  authorized  level  in  Senate  bill  1300  is  a 
positive step. 

This  concludes  my  testimony  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer 

any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Miller follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KAREN MILLER, COMMISSIONER, BOONE COUNTY, 

MISSOURI; ON BEHALF OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES 

Good  morning,  Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator  Lott  and  members  of  the  Sub-
committee on Aviation. My name is Karen Miller and I am a County Commissioner 
in  Boone  County,  Missouri.  I  am  here  representing  the  National  Association  of 
Counties  (NACo).  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  testify  on  improving  air 
service to small and rural communities. 

Essential  Air  Service  (EAS)  is  extremely  important  to  NACo  members  in  small 
and  rural  communities,  to  Boone  County,  Missouri  and  to  approximately  143  other 
rural communities served by EAS in 36 states. The other EAS communities in Mis-
souri include Fort Leonard Wood, Joplin, Kirksville and Cape Girardeau. 

In a nutshell, EAS keeps all these communities connected to the rest of America. 
It provides a link for citizens to travel to the larger communities plus a link to the 
Nation and world through the hub airports to which EAS connects. EAS plays a key 
role  in  local  communities  by  attracting  and  retaining  businesses  that  depend  on 
commercial air service and in healthcare by enabling our citizens to more easily ac-
cess sophisticated healthcare that is often absent in rural communities. NACo hopes 
that  the  final  aviation  reauthorization  legislation  will  extend  EAS  and  provide  an 
authorized  level  of  funding  and  dedicated  source  of  funding  that  is  adequate  for 
meeting  the  demands  and  costs  of  the  program  and  make  a  number  of  reforms  to 
the program. 

Columbia  Regional  Airport,  located  in  Boone  County,  Missouri  began  receiving 
EAS  service  in  October  2006  when  Trans  States  Airlines  pulled  out  of  the  market. 
Mr.  Chairman,  please  note  that  this  occurred  not  because  of  a  decrease  in 
enplanements  but  because  Trans  States  decided  to  change  from  turbo  prop  planes 
to  regional  jets  and  that  made  Columbia  uneconomic  to  serve.  Columbia  Regional 
Airport  serves  an  area  of  about  428,000  people  and  includes  the  University  of  Mis-
souri and the state capital in Jefferson City. We also have a strong business commu-
nity  that  is  always  looking  for  more  employers.  Believe  when  I  say  one  of  the  first 
questions  we  get  from  businesses  looking  to  relocate  to  our  area  is,  ‘‘How  far  are 
you from a commercial airport.’’ It dramatically improves our competitiveness to say 
10 miles rather than 115 miles to St. Louis or 135 miles to Kansas City. 

While having EAS has been important to our region, the result of the change from 
non-subsidized  to  subsidized  service  has  not  been  without  challenges  and  we  have 
seen  a  reduction  in  enplanements—from  almost  20,000  in  2005  to  13,673  in  2006 
to  a  projected  level  of  less  than  10,000  in  2007.  Until  July  7,  2007,  Columbia  re-
ceived four EAS flights per day during the week and two flight per day on the week-
end, all provided by Air Midwest. The flights were split evenly between Kansas City 
and  St.  Louis.  Due  to  the  unreliability  of  the  flights  and  the  schedule,  we  agreed 
to  a  change  in  service.  Many  of  Air  Midwest’s  flights  were  leaving  1–3  hours  late 
and  this  lack  of  reliability  was  driving  away  passengers.  Furthermore,  the  ability 
of  business  travelers  to  complete  a  one-day  return  trip  was  not  very  practical.  The 
first flights out of Columbia to St. Louis left too late for the first round of connecting 
flights  from  St.  Louis  and  the  last  flight  back  to  Colombia  from  St.  Louis  left  too 
early  for  the  connecting  returning  flights,  and  the  last  flight  from  Kansas  City  cre-
ated  a  long  wait  for  returning  travelers.  Effective  July  8,  all  these  flights  will  go 
to Kansas City where Air Midwest has its own gate and maintenance operation. We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

13 

hope  moving  all  flights  to  Kansas  City  will  improve  reliability,  make  our  service 
more attractive and increase enplanements. 

NACo  has  a  number  of  suggestions  for  improving  the  Essential  Air  Service  Pro-
gram.  The  goal  of  a  number  of  these  recommendations  is  to  build  up  the 
enplanements in a community so that air carriers can offer service without an EAS 
subsidy.  There  needs  to  be  more  funding.  It  is  certainly  fair  to  say  that  the  cost  of 
fuel,  equipment  and  operations  of  air  service  has  increased.  We  applaud  the  Com-
merce Committee for increasing EAS funding to $133 million. Certainly, the Admin-
istration’s  proposal  to  reduce  the  program  to  $50  million  and  limit  EAS  to  78  com-
munities  makes  little  sense  as  does  proposing  limiting  eligibility  for  EAS  to  those 
communities currently in the program. We also need more funds so we can subsidize 
better  service.  Like  any  other  product  or  service,  EAS  has  to  be  attractive  to  the 
customer.  Hopefully  with  more  funds,  the  issues  often  raised  by  EAS  communities 
concerning  frequency,  convenience,  and  type  of  aircraft  can  be  better  addressed.  In 
the  last  Congress,  both  the  House  and  Senate  recognized  the  increasing  needs  and 
funded EAS at $117 million only to have the final funding reduced to $109 million, 
the same figure as FY 2006. 

We also ask this subcommittee to help identify an additional dedicated or guaran-
teed source of revenue for the EAS program. The Airport Improvement Program has 
it,  the  highway  program  and  transit  program  both  have  it.  While  the  international 
over flight fee generates $50 million annually for EAS, the remainder currently has 
to come from the General Fund and this creates an uncertainty for the communities 
and the air carriers. An additional dependable source, such as the Airport and Air-
way Trust Fund, which assures communities and air carriers that the program will 
be  fully  funded,  would  make  EAS  a  stronger  program.  Another  option  would  be  to 
require  the  Trust  Fund  to  help  fund  EAS  to  the  extent  that  the  over  flight  fee  and 
General Fund contribution failed to reach the fully authorized level. 

We  believe  the  Local  Participation  Program,  currently  in  law  but  never  imple-
mented, which requires a 10 percent match requirement in ten communities should 
be  repealed.  Many  of  the  small  and  rural  communities  that  would  be  required  to 
provide a local match are not able to find the tens of thousands of dollars the match 
would require. 

The $200 subsidy cap should be increased and indexed. It has been in place since 
1989  and  while  we  are  not  opposed  to  the  concept  of  a  cap,  one  that  hasn’t  been 
changed in 18 years needs adjustment. 

We  believe  that  there  needs  to  be  either  an  incentive  for  improved  service  or  a 
penalty  for  those  air  carriers  who  provide  unreliable  service.  Carriers  get  paid  for 
completed  service,  whether  on  time  or  3  hours  late.  Section  405  of  S.  1300  moves 
in the right direction but we would recommend requiring the Secretary of Transpor-
tation  to  provide  incentives  for  carriers  to  improve  air  service,  as  opposed  to  this 
being discretionary, and include penalties for poor service. 

There  needs  to  be  more  marketing  of  EAS  service  to  the  community.  Marketing 
funding  should  be  provided  directly  through  the  EAS  program.  NACo  supports  the 
provision now included in S. 1300 requiring airlines who are bidding on EAS service 
to include a funded marketing plan in their proposal. 

One final suggestion to improve EAS service is that we need to study approaches 
to encouraging more airlines to bid on providing EAS service. More competition may 
result in better service. 

As  I  conclude,  let  me  also  indicate  NACo’s  support  for  the  Small  Community  Air 
Service  Development  Program.  This  program  needs  to  be  funded  at  a  level  that 
comes  close  to  meeting  the  demand  and  the  $35  million  annual  authorized  level  in 
S.  1300  is  a  positive  step.  Every  year  grant  applications  exceed  the  available  fund-
ing  by  a  substantial  margin  and  the  $10  million  appropriated  for  FY  2007  is  inad-
equate.  In  particular,  small  communities  need  marketing  dollars  to  help  them  get 
the word out to their residents that airline service is available. We also believe the 
match requirement for this program needs to be modified, perhaps to reflect commu-
nity size. 

This concludes my testimony and I would be happy to answer any questions sub-

committee members may have. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Ms.  Miller.  Our  next 
witness  is  Mark  F.  Courtney,  the  Airport  Director  of  Lynchburg’s 
Regional Airport in Lynchburg, Virginia. Mr. Courtney? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

14 

STATEMENT OF MARK F. COURTNEY, A.A.E., AIRPORT 

DIRECTOR, LYNCHBURG REGIONAL AIRPORT 

Mr.  COURTNEY.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens.  On  behalf  of  the 
City  of  Lynchburg  and  the  Lynchburg  Regional  Airport  Commis-
sion,  I  would  like  to  thank  you  for  this  invitation  to  appear  before 
your  Subcommittee  to  speak  on  the  topic  of  the  Small  Community 
Air Service Development Program. 

Now,  Lynchburg  Regional  Airport  is  classified  as  a  non-hub  air-
port  and  is  the  primary  commercial  service  airport  serving  a  four- 
county area in central Virginia surrounding Lynchburg, Virginia. 

Prior to September 11, Lynchburg enjoyed daily airline service by 
affiliates  of  three  airlines:  Delta,  United  and  US  Airways,  with  a 
total  of  19  daily  departures  to  four  different  major  hub  airports. 
Following  the  events  of  September  11th,  however,  Lynchburg,  as 
did  many  similar  sized  airports,  suffered  a  disproportionate  reduc-
tion  in  airline  service  and  seat  capacity  as  airlines  reduced  flight 
schedules. 

Then, in the Fall of 2001, our United Express affiliate announced 
that it would be withdrawing all service from Lynchburg and close 
its  station.  Suddenly,  Lynchburg  was  left  with  just  12  scheduled 
airline departures while suffering a 38 percent loss of daily seat ca-
pacity  compared  to  September  2000.  The  number  of  local  air  trav-
elers  driving  to  other  airports  for  their  air  travel  needs  reached 
nearly  60  percent.  By  the  end  of  calendar  year  2001,  Lynchburg’s 
total passenger traffic had dropped 42 percent from the prior year. 
In 2002, Lynchburg was fortunate to receive its first grant under 
the  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development  Program  in  the 
amount  of  $500,000  that,  when  combined  with  $100,000  in  local 
funds, made possible a revenue guarantee form of incentive for the 
purpose  of  upgrading  our  existing  turboprop  service  to  regional 
jets.  Delta  Airlines  subsequently  accepted  our  proposal  and  new 
service began May 4, 2003 for a 1-year period. 

With  the  introduction  of  the  new  jet  service  and  Delta’s  agree-
ment  to  offer  a  new,  more  competitive  pricing  structure,  Delta’s 
passenger load factors at Lynchburg jumped from 49 percent in Au-
gust  of  2003  to  nearly  64  percent  by  October.  Even  more  encour-
aging,  Delta’s  passenger  revenues  actually  went  up  under  the  new 
lower pricing structure, despite this decrease in airfares. 

By  the  Winter  of  2004,  it  was  evident  that  the  new  service  was 
a  complete  success  and  it  was  exceeding  expectations.  By  April, 
Delta officials confirmed that they would continue the service after 
the 1-year revenue guarantee period ended. 

Of  course,  a  lot  has  happened  in  the  airline  industry  since  that 
time.  With  multiple  legacy  airline  bankruptcies  over  the  past  few 
years, further reductions in both domestic flights and seat capacity 
have  become  the  norm.  But  as  our  new  service  continued  to  per-
form well and grow, the response wasn’t to increase service, but to 
increase  fares.  In  fact,  from  an  average  roundtrip  leisure  fare  of 
$270  in  January  2005,  Lynchburg’s  average  published  fares  to  our 
most  popular  destinations  have  increased  an  alarming  58  percent. 
And, despite passenger traffic levels that remain amazingly stable, 
fares have continued to escalate, while service has diminished. 

Over  the  last  couple  of  years,  it  seems  that  every  time  that  we 
have seen our load factors improve, the airlines have responded not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

15 

by increasing service to meet the increased demand, but by increas-
ing  fares.  Compared  to  the  same  month  last  year,  our  current  lei-
sure  fares  are  up  30  percent  and  just  last  week  Delta  Connection 
announced that it was eliminating one of its three daily RJ flights 
in  September.  When  combined  with  an  earlier  flight  reduction  by 
US  Airways,  by  September,  Lynchburg  will  have  lost  over  19  per-
cent of our daily seat capacity just since the beginning of the year. 
In fact, our September seat count will represent the lowest num-
ber  of  airline  seats  offered  at  this  airport  in  decades.  And  yet, 
through all this, our passenger enplanements year-to-date are actu-
ally off just 4.3 percent compared to last year. 

With  the  past  success  of  our  2002  grant,  Lynchburg  was  once 
again successful in being awarded a similar but smaller DOT grant 
in  2006  to  be  used  to  help  attract  a  third  carrier  back  to  the  air-
port,  as  well  as  the  return  of  a  northern  connecting  city,  particu-
larly a hub city. With nearly a year behind us under the new grant, 
we  continue  to  struggle  to  gain  an  airline  commitment.  With  re-
gional  airline  fleets  continuing  to  face  pressure,  high  fuel  prices 
and  hub  and  air  traffic  capacity  issues  placing  limitations  on 
flights,  our  current  $405,000  total  incentive  package  has  failed  to 
get  much  attention  from  an  airline.  While  we  are  hopeful  that  we 
will  eventually  be  successful,  current  airline  economics  and  fleet 
trends  seem  to  be  conspiring  against  small  non-hub  airports  like 
Lynchburg. 

Now, without a doubt, the current airline operating environment 
has  made  service  to  smaller  communities  even  more  problematic, 
with the airlines showing very little interest in our pleas for better 
air  service  and  more  competitive  airfares.  The  airlines’  revolving 
door  of  raising  fares  every  time  our  load  factors  improve  has  cre-
ated a Catch-22 that keeps us from performing to our potential and 
provides an ongoing excuse to reduce service levels further. 

The  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development  Program  is 
clearly  needed  and  represents  one  source  that  smaller  airports 
have to provide airline incentives that would otherwise not be pos-
sible.  But  to  me,  it  also  seems  apparent  that  higher  individual 
grant  amounts  have  become  necessary  in  order  to  gain  the  atten-
tion  of  an  airline.  In  our  case,  cash  incentives  that  can  be  offered 
to  offset  a  new  airline’s  startup  costs  during  the  first  6  months  or 
so  seem  to  be  the  most  effective  but  it  also  seems  obvious  that’s 
only  if  the  incentive  is  high  enough.  This  becomes  even  more  com-
pelling when you consider that the mainline carriers are controlling 
more and more of the regional fleet seat capacity directly. The days 
of independent, code-sharing regional partners who make the serv-
ice and scheduling decisions themselves appear to be gone. 

When  looked  at  in  the  context  of  5  years  ago,  it  is  clear  that  for 
Lynchburg  Regional  Airport,  our  Fiscal  Year  2002  grant  was  a 
complete  success.  More  recently,  however,  it  has  also  been  clear 
that  ongoing  challenges  in  the  domestic  airline  industry  have  cre-
ated even greater challenges for small communities like Lynchburg. 
It  just  seems  that  for  smaller,  non-hub  airports  like  Lynchburg 
Regional  Airport  that  have  viable,  self-sustaining  air  travel  mar-
kets,  airline  deregulation  hasn’t  worked  in  a  long  time  and  I  fear 
it’s just getting worse. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

16 

I  encourage  Congress  and  this  Committee  to  continue  programs 
such as this that have a proven record and to focus on more attrac-
tive  financial  incentives  for  those  non-hub  airports  that  have  the 
greatest  monetary  need  and  the  greatest  chance  of  success.  Thank 
you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Courtney follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK F. COURTNEY, A.A.E., AIRPORT DIRECTOR, 

LYNCHBURG REGIONAL AIRPORT 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Ranking  Member  Lott  and  members  of  the  Senate  Com-
merce  Committee’s  Aviation  Subcommittee,  on  behalf  of  the  City  of  Lynchburg  and 
the Lynchburg Regional Airport Commission, I would like to thank you for your in-
vitation to appear before your subcommittee to speak on the topic of the Small Com-
munity  Air  Service  Development  Program.  Lynchburg  Regional  Airport  (LYH)  has 
had the opportunity to participate in this program through two separate grants, and 
today I would like to focus on our experiences with this program. 
Background 

Lynchburg  Regional  Airport  (LYH)  is  classified  as  a  non-hub  airport  and  is  the 
primary  commercial  service  airport  serving  a  four-county  area  in  central  Virginia 
surrounding  Lynchburg,  Virginia.  With  a  service  area  population  of  221,000,  LYH 
is currently served by the regional affiliates of two airlines, Delta and US Airways, 
and  today  offers  a  total  of  seven  daily  departures  to  airline  hubs  in  Atlanta  and 
Charlotte. 

Lynchburg  Regional  Airport,  like  many  similar-sized  airports,  was  particularly 
hard  hit  by  the  events  of  September  11,  2001.  Prior  to  September  11,  LYH  enjoyed 
daily  scheduled  airline  service  by  three  airlines  (Delta,  United  and  US  Airways) 
with a total of 19 daily departures to four different major hub airports. Lynchburg’s 
total  passenger  traffic  during  a  ten-year  period  preceding  September  11  averaged 
approximately 180,000 passengers annually, with the local market easily supporting 
daily airline seat capacity in the 500-seat range. 

In  the  immediate  days  following  September  11,  LYH,  like  most  airports  through-
out  the  country,  experienced  a  dramatic  decline  in  passenger  demand.  Then,  in  the 
Fall  of  2001,  United  Express  carrier  Atlantic  Coast  Airlines,  one  of  our  three  air-
lines,  announced  that  it  would  be  withdrawing  all  service  from  LYH  and  close  its 
station. But, unlike many larger airports, LYH suffered a disproportionate reduction 
in airline service and seat capacity as flight schedules were reduced. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
1
t
r
u
o
c
7
1
7

17 

Air Travelers Turn to Other Airports 

Suddenly,  LYH  was  left  with  just  12  scheduled  airline  departures  daily,  down 
from  19,  while  suffering  a  38  percent  loss  of  daily  seat  capacity  compared  to  Sep-
tember  2000.  The  result  was  an  increase  in  the  number  of  local  air  travelers  who 
opted to drive to other near-by airports to accommodate their travel needs, reaching 
a point that the number of local air travelers driving to other airports reached near-
ly 60 percent. As a result, by the end of CY 2001, Lynchburg’s total passenger traffic 
had dropped 42 percent from the prior year. 

LYH and the 2002 SCASD Pilot Program 

In 2002 LYH received its first grant under the Small Community Air Service De-
velopment Program (SCASDP) in the amount of $500,000 that, when combined with 
$100,000  in  local  funds,  made  possible  a  revenue  guarantee  to  utilize  as  an  airline 
incentive  to  upgrade  our  existing  turboprop  aircraft  to  regional  jets.  Delta  Airlines 
subsequently  accepted  our  proposal  and  new  service  began  May  4,  2003  for  a  one- 
year period under a revenue guarantee arrangement. 

With the introduction of the new jet service and Delta’s agreement to offer a new, 
more  competitive  pricing  structure,  Delta’s  passenger  load  factors  at  LYH  jumped 
from 49 percent in August 2003 to nearly 64 percent by October. Even more encour-
aging, Delta’s passenger revenues actually went up under the new pricing structure, 
despite  the  slight  decrease  in  airfares.  Overall,  Delta’s  passenger  traffic  went  from 
2,111 total passengers in April 2002, the month before the new CRJ service started, 
to 4,735 by October 2003. 

By  the  Winter  of  2004,  it  was  evident  that  the  new  service  was  a  complete  suc-
cess, and that it was exceeding expectations. In fact, under the formula for the rev-
enue guarantee, in February 2004 total revenues actually exceeded the target under 
the  agreement  for  the  first  time.  By  April,  we  exceeded  the  revenue  target  by  ap-
proximately $20,000 and received confirmation from Delta officials that they deemed 
the  program  a  success  and  would  be  continuing  the  service  after  it  expired  in  May 
2004. 
Then and Now 

Of  course,  a  lot  has  happened  since  then  and  much  has  changed  in  the  airline 
operating environment. With multiple legacy airline bankruptcies in the intervening 
years,  further  reductions  in  both  flights  and  seat  capacity  have  become  the  norm. 
But  as  our  new  service  continued  to  perform  well,  the  response  wasn’t  to  increase 
service, but to increase fares. In fact, from an average roundtrip leisure fare of $270 
in  January  2005,  LYH’s  average  published  fares  to  our  most  popular  destinations 
have increased an alarming 58 percent. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
2
t
r
u
o
c
7
1
7

18 

And, despite passenger traffic levels that remain amazingly stable, fares have con-
tinued  to  escalate,  while  service  has  diminished.  In  our  case,  over  the  last  couple 
of  years,  it  seems  that  every  time  that  we  have  seen  our  load  factors  improve,  the 
airlines have responded not by increasing service, but by increasing fares. Compared 
to  the  same  month  last  year,  our  lowest  leisure  fares  are  up  30  percent,  and  just 
last week Delta Connection announced that it was eliminating one of its three daily 
RJ flights in September. When combined with an earlier flight reduction by US Air-
ways,  by  September  LYH  will  have  lost  over  19  percent  of  our  daily  seat  capacity 
just  since  the  beginning  of  this  year.  In  fact,  our  September  seat  count  will  rep-
resent the lowest number of airline seats offered at this airport in decades. And yet, 
through  all  this,  our  passenger  enplanements  year-to-date  are  off  just  4.3  percent 
compared to the same period last year. 

Lynchburg’s 2006 SCASD Program Grant 

With the past success of our 2002 grant, LYH was once again successful in being 
awarded a similar, but smaller, grant in 2006 to be used to help attract a third car-
rier  back  to  the  airport,  as  well  as  the  return  of  a  northern  connecting  hub  city. 
With nearly a year behind us under the new grant, we continue to struggle to gain 
an airline commitment. With regional airline fleets continuing to face pressure, high 
fuel prices and hub and air traffic capacity issues placing limitations on flights, our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4

t
r
u
o
c
7
1
7

s
p
e

.
3
t
r
u
o
c
7
1
7

19 

current $405,000 incentive package has failed to get much attention from an airline. 
While we are hopeful that we will eventually be successful, current airline econom-
ics and fleet trends seem to be conspiring against small non-hub airports like LYH. 
Conclusion 

Without  a  doubt,  the  current  airline  operating  environment  has  made  service  to 
smaller communities even more problematic, with the airlines showing little interest 
in our pleas for better air service and more competitive airfares. The airlines’ revolv-
ing  door  of  raising  fares  every  time  our  load  factors  improve  has  created  a  ‘‘Catch 
22’’ that keeps us from performing to our potential, and provides an ongoing excuse 
to reduce service levels further. 

The  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development  Program  is  clearly  needed  and 
represents one source smaller airports have to provide airline incentives that would 
otherwise  not  be  possible.  But  it  also  seems  apparent  that  higher  grant  amounts 
have become necessary in order to gain the attention of an airline. In our case, cash 
incentives that can be offered to offset a new airline’s start-up costs during the first 
6  months  or  so  seem  to  be  the  most  effective,  if  the  incentive  is  high  enough.  This 
becomes  even  more  compelling  when  you  consider  that  the  mainline  carriers  are 
controlling  more  and  more  of  the  regional  fleet  seat  capacity  directly.  The  days  of 
independent,  code-sharing  regional  partners  who  make  the  service  and  scheduling 
decisions themselves appear to be all but gone. 

When looked at in the context of 5 years ago, it is clear that for LYH our FY 2002 
grant was a complete success. The program was instituted at a very opportune time 
for our airport, and the timing for execution of our proposal was perfect. At the time 
of the grant offer, the airport was significantly underserved, which was compounded 
by inordinately high airfares. 

The implementation of a revenue guarantee program was exactly the best way to 
address our particular program at the time in that it provided compensation to the 
airline  during  the  critical  market  development  phase  of  new  service  introduction. 
The result was a steady decrease in revenue guarantee payments to the airline, cul-
minating at the end of the program in revenues that exceeded goals. 

More  recently,  however,  it  has  become  clear  that  recent  changes  in  the  domestic 
airline  industry  have  created  even  greater  challenges  for  small  communities  like 
Lynchburg. For smaller non-hub airports that have viable, self-sustaining air travel 
markets, it seems that airline deregulation hasn’t worked in a long time, and I fear 
that it is just getting worse. I would encourage Congress to continue programs such 
as  this  that  have  a  proven  record,  and  to  focus  on  more  attractive  financial  incen-
tives  for  those  non-hub  airports  that  have  the  greatest  monetary  need  and  the 
greatest chance of success. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Courtney.  Senator  Dorgan,  do 

you have an opening statement you want to make at this time? 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’ll  wait  until  your  witnesses 

have completed their statements. 

Senator STEVENS. Senator, do you feel the same way? 
Senator VITTER. Yes, I have questions for the witnesses. 
Senator STEVENS. Ms. Malarkey, you are—Faye Malarkey is Vice 
President of Legislative Affairs for the Regional Airline Association 
stationed here in Washington. Ms. Malarkey? 

STATEMENT OF FAYE MALARKEY, VICE PRESIDENT, 

LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS, REGIONAL AIRLINE ASSOCIATION 
Ms.  MALARKEY.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens.  Thank  you  for  the 
opportunity to testify today and for holding this important hearing. 
RAA represents 41 regional airlines that link together 600 commu-
nities in the United States. At more than 70 percent of these com-
munities,  regional  airlines  are,  as  you  know,  providing  the  only 
source  of  scheduled  airline  service.  Nowhere  is  the  importance  of 
regional airline service more apparent than at the over 140 commu-
nities across the country that receive air service through EAS. 

As  this  Committee  knows,  continuing  financial  challenges  in  the 
aviation  industry  have  made  air  service  to  smaller  communities 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

20 

significantly more expensive. In the past 5 years alone, 40 commu-
nities  have  been  forced  onto  the  EAS  roles  and  17  communities 
have  been  dropped  from  the  program.  The  smallest  airports  have 
seen  a  21  percent  decline  in  daily  departures.  Airports  with  be-
tween  3  and  6  daily  flights  have  experienced  a  33  percent  decline 
in departures. Many communities have lost air service all together. 
A promise was made to small communities back in 1978 that de-
regulation would not leave them behind. The vehicle for this prom-
ise  has  been  EAS.  We  applaud  this  Committee  for  upholding  that 
promise,  for  resisting  proposals  that  would  dismantle  the  program 
and  for  choosing  instead  to  increase  funding  for  the  EAS  Program 
as part of its reauthorization package. 

One  of  the  greatest  factors  contributing  to  small  community  air 
service  reductions  is  the  recent  and  staggering  increases  in  fuel 
costs.  To  put  this  into  perspective,  EAS  contracts  currently  have  a 
2-year  lifespan.  A  carrier  that  negotiated  a  competitive  contract  a 
year  ago  would  have  based  cost  projections  on  then-current  fuel 
rates  of  $1.80  a  gallon.  That  same  carrier  would  be  providing  the 
service  today  with  fuel  costs  of  nearly  $3.00  a  gallon.  In  other 
words,  climbing  fuel  costs  can  quickly  turn  once  profitable  routes 
into losses. 

Unfortunately,  EAS  carriers  lack  a  mechanism  to  renegotiate 
rates  and  must  instead  file  90-day  service  termination  notices  in 
order  to  adjust.  Even  after  filing  such  notices,  as  you  know,  car-
riers  are  held  in  at  loss  rates  for  180  days.  This  Committee  in-
cluded  a  rate  index  mechanism  provision  in  Vision  100  that  would 
allow the DOT to make real-time rate adjustments in cases of such 
increased  costs.  Unfortunately,  DOT  has  been  unwilling  to  imple-
ment the program. 

RAA  therefore  respectfully  asks  this  Committee  to  include  lan-
guage  in  its  present  FAA  bill  to  require  implementation.  Recently, 
DOT  has  stated  that  the  EAS  Program  is  not  facing  any  crisis  in 
funding.  RAA  holds  our  colleagues  at  the  DOT  in  the  highest  es-
teem  but  we  do  not  agree  with  this  assessment.  The  demonstra-
bility  of  funding  needs  and  expenditures  related  to  the  program  is 
closely tied to its management. 

When  DOT  cuts  service  levels  or  eliminates  points  in  order  to 
lower program expenditures without reinvesting in the program, it 
generates  cash  in  the  EAS  coffers.  The  results  of  this  practice  are 
balance  sheets  that  suggest  the  program  is  over-funded.  In  order 
to  fully  explore  this  issue,  RAA  requests  that  Congress  require  an 
audit  on  unspent,  obligated  funds  currently  retained  on  the  EAS 
balance sheets. 

As  I’ve  mentioned  previously,  DOT  contracts  have  a  2-year  life 
span. Unfortunately, airlines’ ability to commit aircraft in a dimin-
ishing  market  has  grown  more  difficult.  In  fact,  one  reason  there 
are so few new-entrant EAS carriers may be attributed to the lack 
of financing for aircraft with short-term commitment levels. 

We  are  therefore  pleased  that  this  Committee  has  expressed  in-
terest in upgrading EAS contract terms beyond their current 2-year 
lengths.  By  upgrading  the  EAS  contract  terms  to  four  or  5  year 
service  commitments,  existing  carriers  would  be  better  able  to 
renew  current  contracts,  a  significant  barrier  to  market  entry 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

21 

would  be  removed  and  all  carriers  would  be  better  able  to  finance 
aircraft. 

RAA  believes  the  FAA’s  own  reauthorization  proposal  discrimi-
nates  against  passengers  from  smaller  communities.  Regional  air-
lines provide 14,000 flights daily. To dismiss regional airline flights 
and  our  passengers  as  a  mere  blip  on  a  radar  screen  is  to  ignore 
the crucial service we provide in smaller communities. 

We  share  an  important  goal  with  this  Committee.  That  goal  is 
advancing  an  FAA  reauthorization  bill  that  makes  modernization 
of  the  ATC  system  a  priority.  We  applaud  this  Committee  for  its 
work  on  the  shared  objective.  As  you  know,  we  do  have  concerns 
about policy impacts stemming from the proposed user fee element. 
We  are  therefore  truly  appreciative  of  this  Committee’s  invitation 
to  work  with  us  further  to  address  those  concerns.  We  pledge  to 
work  hard  to  find  common  ground.  We’re  willing  to  pay  our  fair 
share  for  the  extremely  important  objective  of  modernizing  our 
ATC  system.  We  simply  seek  a  modest  adjustment  to  the  user  fee 
language  to  ensure  it  treats  passengers  equally  regardless  of  the 
point at which they access the system. 

We  are  confident  that  together  with  this  Committee,  we  can  ad-
dress these specific concerns while moving forward with an FAA re-
authorization this year. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  your  attention  to  this  important 
issue and for the opportunity to testify today. I look forward to re-
sponding to your questions at the conclusion of the panel. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Malarkey follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FAYE MALARKEY, VICE PRESIDENT, LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS, 

REGIONAL AIRLINE ASSOCIATION 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator  Lott,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank 
you for the opportunity to testify before you today. I am pleased to testify on behalf 
of  the  Regional  Airline  Association.  We  thank  you  for  holding  this  important  hear-
ing. 

RAA  represents  41  U.S.  regional  airlines  transporting  97  percent  of  regional  air-
line  passengers.  Our  member  airlines  operate  9  to  68-seat  turboprop  aircraft  and 
30  to  108-seat  regional  jets  and  link  together  more  than  600  communities  in  the 
United States. 

At  more  than  70  percent  of  these  communities,  regional  airlines  provide  the  only 
source  of  scheduled  airline  service.  Nowhere  is  the  importance  of  regional  airline 
service  more  apparent  than  at  the  more  than  140  rural  communities  across  the 
country  that  receive  scheduled  air  service  through  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation’s Essential Air Service Program (EAS). 
Background 

Because  of  continuing  financial  pressures  in  the  post-9/11  aviation  industry,  at 
least  40  additional  communities  have  been  forced  onto  the  EAS  roles  and  17  EAS 
communities  have  been  dropped  from  the  program  altogether  in  the  past  5  years. 
The  smallest  airports—those  with  between  one  and  three  daily  departures—have 
seen  a  21  percent  decline  in  daily  departures  between  September  2001  and  Sep-
tember  2006.  Thirteen  of  these  airports  have  lost  service  altogether.  Airports  with 
between  three  and  six  daily  flights  in  September  2001  have  experienced  a  33  per-
cent  decline  in  departures  since  then,  with  eight  such  airports  losing  service  alto-
gether. 

As Members of this Subcommittee know, EAS was initially created as part of the 
Airline  Deregulation  Act  of  1978.  The  program  has  been  in  effect  each  year  since 
under various funding proposals. Many members of this Subcommittee will remem-
ber  that,  in  1999,  DOT  issued  several  service  termination  orders,  triggering  broad 
opposition from communities and air carriers. This highlighted the need for a suffi-
cient and stable funding stream for EAS. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

22 

Thanks in large part to the strong leadership of this Committee, EAS has received 
funding  increases  which  have  helped  it  keep  pace  with  changing  market  realities. 
Department of Transportation and Federal Aviation Administration Proposals 

Unfortunately,  the  proposal  contained  in  the  FAA’s  own  reauthorization  bill  this 
year  would  severely  cut  and  potentially  dismantle  the  EAS  program  as  funding 
would fall by $59 million from current enacted levels, effectively forcing out a third 
or  more  of  the  communities  that  now  use  the  program.  The  proposal  further  caps 
EAS  subsidies  at  current  levels  and  prohibits  the  addition  of  new  EAS  points  for 
communities  that  lose  air  service  in  the  future,  telling  residents  of  these  commu-
nities that convenient, reliable air service is a luxury, and one they can’t have. For 
the others, DOT would set up a tiered system to grant reduced subsidies to commu-
nities  in  descending  order  of  distance  from  nearby  hub  airports,  starting  in  Alaska 
and  continuing  until  the  funding  runs  out,  which  is  sure  to  happen  long  before 
DOT’s obligation to EAS communities has been met. 

If  enacted,  this  proposal  would  jeopardize  rural  air  service  in  an  unprecedented 
way  because  it  fails  to  reflect  the  fact  that,  of  140  current  EAS  communities,  85— 
36  in  Alaska  alone—are  further  than  210  miles  away  from  a  medium  or  large  hub 
airport. Dozens more are further than 150 miles away from the nearest medium or 
large  hub  airport.  Yet,  under  the  DOT’s  proposal,  even  many  remote  communities 
would  lose  air  service  as  the  funding  level  proposed  by  DOT  is  simply  too  low  to 
continue the program in any meaningful way. 

Congress promised small communities, back in 1978, that deregulation would not 
leave  them  behind;  rather,  communities  receiving  scheduled  air  service  before  de-
regulation  would  continue  to  receive  scheduled  air  service  after  deregulation.  The 
vehicle for this promise has been EAS, and while we recognize the usefulness of re-
form,  we  urge  Congress  to  reject  proposals  that  significantly  cut,  eliminate,  or  un-
dermine this important program. 

Rather than accept proposals to cut the program in half, this Committee has elect-
ed  instead  to  increase  funding  by  $6  million  per  year  in  its  FAA  proposal,  bringing 
authorized appropriations to $133 million next year. We are deeply grateful for your 
leadership. 
Carrier Costs and Real-Time Rate Indexing 

One of the greatest factors contributing to diminishing small community air serv-
ice is the continuous and staggering effect of fuel cost increases. Turboprop aircraft 
are  among  the  most  fuel  efficient  aircraft  for  short-haul  routes  and,  like  our  major 
airline  counterparts,  regional  airlines  have  sought  to  minimize  fuel  burn  by 
tankering  fuel,  lowering  cruise  speeds,  safely  altering  approach  procedures,  and  re-
ducing onboard weight. We are making every effort to manage escalating fuel costs 
with an eye toward conservation. Nonetheless, fuel is now the highest cost for many 
regional airlines. 

As  part  of  the  competitive  EAS  application  process,  carriers  negotiate  in  good 
faith with DOT on subsidy rates that remain in effect for 2 years. In doing so, EAS 
carriers  must  project  revenues  and  costs  over  this  same  two-year  time-frame—no 
easy task in today’s volatile cost environment. In cases of unexpected cost increases, 
EAS carriers lack a mechanism to renegotiate rates and must instead enter into the 
unpalatable process of filing 90 day service termination notices in order to begin the 
convoluted process of seeking rates that cover increased costs. This inevitably causes 
ill-will  between  the  airline  and  community  and  fosters  a  sense  of  unreliability  that 
undermines community trust in and use of the air service. 

One  of  the  fundamental  tenets  of  the  EAS  program  held  that  no  carrier  should 
be expected to serve any market at a loss. Yet, in cases of unexpected cost increases, 
carriers  are  unable  to  provoke  rate  changes  without  filing  such  service  termination 
notices, after which each carrier must continue to provide the service, at a loss, for 
180 days while DOT undertakes the competitive bidding process. 

In recent months, crude oil has risen dramatically. For example, one EAS carrier, 
Great  Lakes  Aviation,  has  experienced  annualized,  system-wide  fuel  cost  increases 
of over $4 million. To put these numbers into perspective, please consider this: EAS 
contracts  currently  have  a  two-year  lifetime.  A  winning  carrier  who  negotiated  a 
competitive  contract  1  year  ago  would  have  based  cost  projections  on  then-current 
fuel rates of $1.80 per gallon. That same carrier would now be providing the service 
with  fuel  costs  at  nearly  $3  per  gallon.  Because  EAS  carriers  are  strictly  limited 
to  5  percent  profit  margins,  climbing  fuel  costs  can  quickly  turn  once-profitable 
routes into losses. 

Congress has already addressed this issue. In Section 402 of Vision 100, this Com-
mittee  worked  to  include  a  rate-indexing  mechanism  where  DOT  could  make  real- 
time  rate  adjustments  during  periods  of  significantly  increased  carrier  costs.  In 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

23 

order to prevent deliberate cost underestimation, Congress required carriers to dem-
onstrate  ‘‘significant  increases,’’  and  defined  these  as  10  percent  increases  in  unit 
costs persisting for two or more consecutive months. 

DOT has been unwilling to implement the program to date, citing a lack of funds. 
RAA  therefore  respectfully  asks  this  Committee  to  include  language  in  its  FAA  bill 
to require DOT to make these real-time rate adjustments. 
Program Management 

Recently, DOT has stated that the Essential Air Service program is not facing any 
crisis  in  funding.  RAA  respectfully  disagrees.  The  demonstrability  of  funding  needs 
and  expenditures  related  to  the  EAS  program  is  closely  tied  to  management  of  the 
program.  When  DOT  cuts  service  levels  or  eliminates  points  in  order  to  lower  pro-
grammatic  expenditures  without  reinvesting  in  the  program,  it  generates  excess 
cash in the EAS coffers. This practice produces balance sheets that suggest the pro-
gram is over-funded. In order to fully explore these issues, RAA requests that Con-
gress  require  an  audit  on  unspent,  obligated  EAS  funds  currently  retained  on  the 
EAS balance sheets. Further, RAA requests that leftover funds be reinvested in the 
EAS  program  to  raise  service  levels  at  more  viable  routes,  thereby  allowing  pas-
sengers to best utilize service that has been granted. 

As  Congress  considers  potential  eligibility  criteria  changes,  we  also  ask  that  the 
same  standard  is  applied.  Reforms  to  the  program  should  be  aimed  at  enhancing 
the program and protecting rural air service; not gutting the program. 
Date Certain for Market Exit 

Part of the nature of the Essential Air Service program, as you know, is that car-
riers compete rigorously for contracts. Even in cases where an incumbent carrier de-
sires  to  continue  serving  a  given  market,  DOT  has  the  right  to  select  another  car-
rier. In cases where DOT awards service to a new carrier, RAA believes DOT should 
be required to give the incumbent carrier a date certain when it may exit the mar-
ket, without exception. 

The  current  practice,  where  DOT  holds  the  carrier  in  markets  in  30  day  incre-
ments,  is  untenable.  This  practice  means  a  carrier  cannot  sell  tickets  in  the  EAS 
market  beyond  30  days,  nor  can  it  make  plans  to  utilize  its  aircraft  elsewhere.  We 
urge Congress to end this unfair situation by mandating that DOT adopt a date cer-
tain component for incumbent carrier market exits when it selects an alternate car-
rier to serve the market. 
DOT Term Length Upgrade 

As  you  know,  DOT  contracts  have  a  two-year  lifespan.  Post  9/11,  carriers  pos-
sessed  excess  aircraft  inventory  sufficient  to  facilitate  competitive  bidding  on  new 
EAS  routes.  With  more  and  more  turboprop  aircraft  being  sold  overseas,  there  are 
fewer aircraft available in the United States for this type of service. 

Unfortunately,  airlines’  ability  to  commit  aircraft  in  a  diminishing  market  has 
likewise  grown  more  difficult.  Aircraft  financing  models  are  ill-suited  to  short,  2 
year-year  commitments.  In  fact,  one  reason  there  are  so  few  new-entrant  EAS  car-
riers, may be attributed to the lack of financing for aircraft with short-term commit-
ment levels. 

We are pleased that this Committee has expressed interest in upgrading EAS con-
tract  terms  beyond  the  current,  two-year  program.  By  upgrading  the  EAS  contract 
terms  to  four  or  five-year  service  commitments,  existing  carriers  would  be  better 
able  to  renew  current  contracts,  a  significant  barrier  to  market-entry  would  be  re-
moved,  and  all  carriers  would  better  able  to  finance  aircraft  for  longer-term  obliga-
tions. 
Smaller Aircraft and Very Light Jets 

There has been some recent discussion about the use of Very Light Jets as rising 
operating  costs  of  current  EAS  carriers  have  translated  to  higher  program  costs. 
Ironically, the rising costs in question have occurred as a result of compliance with 
single-level-of  safety  standards  imposed  on  the  industry  in  1997.  While  RAA  does 
not  advocate  a  return  to  separate  regulatory  standards  for  19  seat  operators,  the 
government should not forget that the bulk of increased operating costs on these air-
craft have resulted from this regulatory change. 

Further, the business models of those smaller aircraft remain unproven. The VLJ 
business  models  that  do  exist  promise  direct,  non-stop  service  to  destinations  that 
would  bypass  the  hub-and-spoke  system.  They  would  therefore  fail  to  connect  pas-
sengers  to  the  existing  air  transportation  system  in  favor  of  limited  service.  The 
fares for VLJs are another great unknown, with most advocates acknowledging that 
they are fairly expensive. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

24 

We  strongly  caution  the  Congress  against  advancing  this  unproven  technology  as 
a  solution  to  EAS  shortfalls.  The  Congressional  commitment  to  rural  communities 
during  deregulation  was  a  continuation  of  scheduled  air  service.  It  is  inappropriate 
to  place  the  burden  on  passengers  and  communities  to  secure  air  service  through 
expensive, untested, and potentially unreliable sources. 
FAA Reauthorization and User Fee Proposals 

The  FAA  proposal,  which  treats  commercial  airline  passengers  differently  based 
on  size  or  type  of  aircraft,  discriminates  against  passengers  from  smaller  commu-
nities. Further, the proposal undermines the notion of a national system of commer-
cial  aviation.  Regional  airlines  provide  14,000  flights  daily.  To  ignore  the  crucial 
service  regional  airlines  provide  in  smaller  communities  by  dismissing  regional  air-
line flights and passengers as a mere ‘‘blip’’ on a radar screen represents more than 
an  oversimplification.  With  respect  to  commercial  air  service,  one  blip  can  contain 
250 cost bearing sources while another contains only 19. 

Looking beyond EAS, we share an important goal with this Committee. That goal 
is advancing an FAA Reauthorization bill that makes modernization of the ATC sys-
tem  a  priority.  We  applaud  this  Committee  for  its  work  on  this  shared  objective. 
As  you  know,  we  do  have  concerns  about  policy  impacts  stemming  from  the  pro-
posed  user  fee  element,  which  we  believe  will  prove  harmful  to  small  and  medium- 
sized communities if not adjusted. 

We  are  therefore  truly  appreciative  of  this  Committee’s  invitation  to  work  with 
us further on those issues and we pledge to work hard to find common ground. We 
are  willing  to  pay  our  fair  share  for  the  extremely  important  objective  of  modern-
izing  our  ATC  system.  We  simply  seek  an  adjustment  to  the  user  fee  language  to 
ensure it treats passengers equally, regardless of the point at which they access the 
system. We are confident that, together with this Committee, we can address these 
specific concerns while moving forward with FAA reauthorization this year. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  this  important  issue 
today. I look forward to responding to your questions at the conclusion of the panel. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much, Ms. Malarkey. You 
said you wanted to talk about requiring a limitation on whom? On 
the  Department  of  the  Treasury  or  what  limitation  did  you  men-
tion? 

Ms.  MALARKEY.  I’m  sorry,  I’m  not  sure  that  I  understand—the 
limitation that I—I mentioned that we would like to have an audit 
on the unspent funds in the EAS coffers. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Yes,  I  heard  that  but  you  also  said  something 
about  requiring  a  limitation  on  the  funds?  Look  over  your  state-
ment and I’ll come back to you, OK? 

Ms. MALARKEY. OK. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Secretary,  we’re  delighted  to  have  you 

here. Have you been to Alaska? 

Mr.  STEINBERG.  Yes,  I  was  there  about  2  years  ago  and  I  got  a 

chance to see—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Did  you  go  see  some  of  the  places  that  are 

served by Essential Air Service? 

Mr. STEINBERG. I did not see places served by Essential Air Serv-
ice  specifically  but  did  have  a  chance  to  understand  personally 
some of the remote cities and what they have to do. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  let  me  extend  to  you  an  invitation  to 
come  up  in  August.  We  might  find  a  little  extracurricular  activity 
for you in one of the rivers at the same time. 

Mr. STEINBERG. That sounds good. 
Senator  STEVENS.  But  there  is  a  necessity  to  understand  what 
this  is  all  about.  I’m  the  only  surviving  Senator  now  that  was 
around when we made, at least on this Committee, created this Es-
sential  Air  Service  Program.  It  was  created  by  Senator  Cannon  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

25 

Nevada and me because of the problem in Alaska primarily and in 
a  few  places  in  Nevada  where  they  were  going  to  lose  air  service 
that  had  been  mandated  by  CAB,  at  a  great  loss  to  the  industry. 
But  we  devised  a  system  whereby  the  community  had  a  right  to 
a subsidy sufficient to give them at least the service that had been 
in place before deregulation. In some of our cities and villages, that 
was about three times a week. Now, in other places, I’m sure it was 
daily.  But  it  has,  as  its  genesis,  the  idea  of  letting  the  community 
decide  who  should  continue  to  service  it  in  terms  of  air  transpor-
tation. 

One  thing  that  was  missing  from  your  statement  was  relevance 
to  cargo.  Essential  Air  Service  covers  cargo,  too,  where  you  have 
seat  passengers  and  cargo  and  I  would  hope  that  you  would  come 
take a look at that. 

Let me ask the other witnesses—does your Essential Air Service 
in  Missouri  and  in  Virginia  and  generally,  Ms.  Malarkey,  do  you 
include cargo service in your what we call Con-P planes? Passenger 
and cargo? 

Mr.  TORGERSON.  Lynchburg  is  not  an  EAS  point  but  we  do  com-
bine,  of  course,  freight  in  our  passenger  planes  because  we  don’t 
have any dedicated cargo except for one carrier. 

Senator  STEVENS.  You’re  not  getting  any  Essential  Air  Service 

assistance now at all? 

Mr. TORGERSON. No assistance, no. No. 
Senator STEVENS. Ms. Miller? 
Ms. MILLER. Senator, I can’t tell you that. I don’t believe that we 

have cargo included in the EAS service that we receive now. 

Senator STEVENS. I don’t—Ms. Malarkey? 
Ms. MALARKEY. We do not have all cargo EAS carriers. We have 
EAS  carriers,  obviously,  that  do  some  carriage  of  mail  and  will  do 
some carriage of cargo but we do not have all cargo EAS. 

Senator STEVENS. We don’t have all cargo service covered by EAS 
either  but  the  Con-P  planes  are  covered  and  I  think  it’s  an  essen-
tial  difference  between  Alaska  and  what  we  call  the  South  48  in 
terms of Essential Air Service Program. 

Mr. Steinberg, you mentioned the problem of the new system and 
the  way  it’s  growing,  particularly  now  with  what  I  call  the  mos-
quito  jets,  the  very  light  jets.  They  probably  won’t  be  Con-P  capa-
ble,  as  I  understand  it.  They’re  going  to  be  9  to  11  seats,  the  ones 
that  I’ve  looked  at.  Have  you  got  any  plans  at  all  to  deal  with  the 
areas  where  they  still  must  have  cargo?  I  mean,  we  don’t  have 
roads  so  as  a  consequence,  not  having  any  road  money  coming  to 
these areas, we provide it through—this was Senator Cannon’s idea 
and  mine,  that  we  would  provide  assistance  through  the  Essential 
Air  Service  for  combined  service  of  passenger  and  freight.  Now, 
how  is  that  going  to  be  sustained  after  the  mosquito  fleet  arrives? 
Mr. STEINBERG. Well, after very light jets are introduced into the 
system,  I  think  you’ll  see  a  couple  different  things  happen.  There 
is  the  potential  for  more  service  for  passengers  but  as  you  point 
out, these planes are pretty small. Actually, the ones that are com-
ing  on  line  now,  I  think,  are  more  like  six  passengers.  However, 
there is another use, of course, for these aircraft and that’s to carry 
cargo  by  itself  and  in  fact,  one  of  the  things  that  is  encouraging 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

26 

about  very  light  jets  is  the  ability  to  provide,  say  medical  equip-
ment and other things that are needed on a real-time basis. 

So ultimately, Senator, it’s all a matter of aircraft economics and 
if cargo can be carried profitably by very light jets, I’m sure it will 
be. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  hope  you’ll  come  up  and  take  a  look. 
I’m an old C7 (1947) and (1946) pilot. They would carry everything, 
right?  These  new  little  jets  are  not  going  to  carry  everything.  You 
won’t be able to get a washing machine in them. You won’t be able 
to get any kind of a—even a large boat motor and there is no other 
way  to  deliver  them  now.  There’s  no  other  way  to  get  up  there  at 
all today. In days gone by, when the freight went up the river once 
a year, they didn’t have those motors. 

Mr. STEINBERG. Well, I think clearly Alaska is a special situation 
because you don’t have the road infrastructure that you need to de-
liver cargo by truck and that distinguishes it from most other parts 
of the U.S. so the Essential Air Service Program will, I think, con-
tinue to be very important to your state. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  John  Torgerson,  I  hope,  Mr.  Commis-
sioner,  you’ll  join  me  in  inviting  our  Secretary  to  come  up  because 
the  transition  of  this  bill—this  is  going  to  be  a  transition  bill  for 
Essential  Air  Services,  no  question  about  it.  Other  states  need  to 
redefine  it  and  we  need  to  redefine  it  so  that  we’re  not  left  out  by 
these  very  light  jets  that  will  be  primarily  supported  by  Essential 
Air Services as I see it in the future. 

Ms. Malarkey, you said you would like to sit down with the staff 

and talk about changes in this bill? 

Ms. MALARKEY. Yes. Yes, we would, very much. In fact, we make 
ourselves  available  at  any  time  in  the  coming  weeks  to  sit  down 
and discuss. Again, we seek a small, minor adjustment to the user 
fee language to ensure—— 

Senator STEVENS. Well, would you mind writing us a little letter 
so the members of the Committee will know what you want to talk 
to the staff about? I think that would be a good idea that you talk 
to  them  but  we’d  like  to  see  what  amendments  you  have  in  mind. 

Ms. MALARKEY. Yes. It would be our pleasure. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Did  anyone  else  have  amendments  in  mind  to 

this bill that we should discuss this morning? 

[No response.] 
Senator STEVENS. John, do you have any amendments to the bill? 
Mr. TORGERSON. No sir, I do not. 
Senator STEVENS. Ms. Miller? 
Ms.  MILLER.  Senator,  I  would  like  to  also  recommend  that  the 
NACo  staff  work  with  your  staff  on  any  amendments  that  may  be 
forthcoming,  as  they’ve  reviewed  Senator  bill  1300.  I  personally 
have  not  had  that  opportunity  so  I  can’t  tell  you  exactly  all  the 
pieces  that  we  would  like  to  work  with  the  staff  to  fine  tune.  But 
I  want  to  make  them  available  and  I  feel  like  Bob  Fogel  will  be  of 
big help to your staff in understanding our issues. 

Senator STEVENS. Mr. Courtney, I think you sort of suggested re- 

regulation, a new CAB. Is that what you’re suggesting? 

Mr.  COURTNEY.  I  didn’t  mean  to  really  suggest  re-regulation  as 
much  as  the  fact  that  deregulation  does  not  work  for  smaller  com-
munities. We are in a unique situation. We’re not an Essential Air 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

27 

Service  point.  We’re  larger  than  that  but  we’re  smaller  than  many 
of the smaller airports that have the kind of financial wherewithal 
and they have the kind of community support to be able to provide 
the  kind  of  incentives  necessary  to  attract  airlines  in  today’s  envi-
ronment.  You  have  to  remember,  we  are  self-sufficient.  We  are 
profitable  for  the  airlines.  Our  problem  is  not  profitability.  Our 
problem  is  competition,  high  fares  and  a  lack  of  choices  out  there 
among the legacy carriers. We cannot attract a low fare carrier be-
cause of the economics of it and we need something like the Small 
Community  Air  Service  Development  Program,  even  in  an  en-
hanced  form,  to  be  able  to  give  us  a  tool  that  we  need  to  be  able 
to attract and get the attention of an airline. 

The  airline  planning  staffs  today,  the  mainline  carriers  are  call-
ing  the  shots,  at  least  when  it  comes  to  most  smaller  communities 
like ours that provide service—line service to the hub airports. And 
we  need  them  very,  very  much  and  we  just  can’t  survive  without 
that  kind  of  connection  and  the  planning  staffs,  we  just  can’t  get 
through  to  them  because  we’re  too  small  of  a  revenue  airport  or 
size  for  the  majors  who  are  facing  all  these  daunting  challenges, 
fighting  back  the  low  fare  carriers  and  the  majors  at  other  larger 
airports.  So  even  though  we’re  profitable,  our  frustration  remains 
in not being able to attract good quality service and keep it. 

Senator  STEVENS.  It  may  interest  you  to  know  when  we  deregu-
lated the airlines and did away with the CAB, Congress, at my re-
quest,  gave  the  State  of  Alaska  the  right  to  create  its  own  CAB  in 
trial,  in  Alaska.  But  we  have  never  utilized  that  authority  for  the 
one reason that we prefer to have some competition and we depend 
so  much  on  airline  transportation  to  get  out  of  Alaska  that  we 
could not regulate. It would not be feasible to end up by regulating 
just in Alaska and not have the interstate commerce regulated. 

I do think that we ought to help you find a way to induce a little 
bit  more  competition  into  your  area  and  it  may  be  that  Essential 
Air  Service  grants  of  small  amounts  would  enable  an  airport  like 
yours to offer a little bit of an incentive to smaller airlines that are 
growing  to  come  and  grow  with  your  traffic.  That’s  what’s  hap-
pened in Alaska to a great extent and I’m sure that Commissioner 
Torgerson  will  tell  you,  we  have  sort  of  vibrant  competition  now, 
even in the smaller areas, to get the Essential Air Service contribu-
tion.  So  it  is  something  that  works  and  I’d  like  to  work  with  you 
along that line. 

Mr.  COURTNEY.  And  Senator  Stevens,  I  might  just  add  that,  as 
it  was  alluded  to  earlier,  that  is  one  of  the  challenges  we’re  facing 
right  now.  We’re  in  an  industry  that  for  scheduled  airline  service, 
the domestic route systems of the airlines are contracting. They are 
reducing  capacity.  It’s  much  more  difficult,  obviously,  to  compete 
for added service or even to keep what you have when the airlines 
are  continuing  to  reduce  service.  That’s  the  reason  we  just  lost— 
or we will be losing one of our regional jets to Atlanta. 

Senator  STEVENS.  But—and  I’m  going  to  quit  here—up  our  way, 
as that happens, they take under their wing a small commuter that 
becomes  a  portion  of  the  major  airline  and  deals  effectively  with 
our  local  commuter  transportation  and  particularly,  that’s  where 
the population base is a little higher than some of the villages. But 
I  do  think  it  would  be  wise  to  have  you  all  come  and  take  a  look 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

28 

and see how it works in Alaska because it does work in Alaska and 
that’s  what  John  is  here  for.  He’s  asking  for  a  continuation  of  the 
program. 

Senator  I’ve  got  to  go  to  another  meeting.  If  you  would,  I’d  be 

honored to have to take—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN {presiding]. Mr. Chairman, because I didn’t give 

an opening statement, let me make a couple of comments. 

First of all, I think airline deregulation has imposed an unbeliev-
able  penalty  on  rural  America.  I  know  regulation  is  a  four-letter 
word  in  this  town  but  if  we  could  all  walk  out  to  National  Airport 
this  morning  and  book  two  flights,  one  to  North  Dakota  and  one 
to Los Angeles, you’ll find that it will cost twice as much to go half 
as far. That’s an unbelievable penalty for people who live in small-
er states, smaller population states. 

So airline deregulation, in my judgment, has worked wonderfully 
for some. If you are from Chicago or Los Angeles or New York, you 
have  multiple  choices  at  competitive  prices  and  good  for  you,  you 
get  a  heck  of  a  bargain  on  the  airlines.  If  you’re  from  other  parts 
of the country, you’re going to be facing airline fares that are unbe-
lievably high if, in fact, you get the service. And these days, you’re 
going  to  be  faced  with  less  service  because  they’re  going  to  reduce 
frequencies on you in most cases and bring in smaller aircraft. 

Let me make a couple of comments about these issues. Mr. Stein-
berg, I’ve had generally a positive experience working with you and 
Mr. Devaney and others in the Department. I’ve appreciated work-
ing with you on EAS issues. I think the Essential Air Service Pro-
gram is very important for many small communities. 

I  don’t  believe  that  we  should  have  to  say  to—we  should  have  a 
circumstance  where  a  community  that  has  Essential  Air  Service 
and doesn’t lift a finger to make it work, I don’t believe we should 
have  to  be  in  a  situation  where  we  say,  you  can  have  that  service 
forever.  You  don’t  have  to  do  anything.  You  can  reduce  to  one  or 
two passengers a day and do nothing to try to promote that service 
and by the way, we’ll just look the other way. 

So  I  think  all  of  us  that  fund  the  Essential  Air  Service  Program 
need  to  say  to  communities,  this  is  part  of  your  responsibility  as 
well. This is not a given forever. If you do nothing to enhance that 
service  and  you  basically  ignore  the  presence  of  that  service,  you 
could end up losing that service. 

Having  airline  service  for  these  small  communities  is  an  impor-
tant  part  of  their  future  economic  development  opportunities  so  I 
think  there  needs  to  be  a  partnership  here  between  the  commu-
nities and the Essential Air Service Program. 

With  respect  to  the  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development 
Program,  I  want  to  understand  how  that’s  working  and  whether 
that’s  working.  We  had  an  experience  in  North  Dakota  that  had  a 
startup airline. That’s now shut down, as I understand it. I’ve been 
seeking  information  about  what  happened  to  the  money.  I’m  not 
suggesting  we  shouldn’t  be  doing  all  kinds  of  experiments  to  find 
out what works and how it works but I think it’s important for us, 
because we’ve committed a lot of money, to find out what has been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

29 

the  result  of  the  committing  of  that  money  in  this  Small  Commu-
nity Air Service Development Program and if we find out what the 
results  have  been  then  we  can  better  tailor  our  future  approaches. 
I think there is an inherent conflict going on and it’s going to get 
much worse. The conflict is this: We have the larger legacy carriers 
that  have  a  hub-and-spoke  system.  They  go  out  to  a  spoke—Mr. 
Courtney,  they  come  to  your  area  as  a  spoke  and  carry  you  into  a 
hub and then move you on in their system in the hub. 

Then  we’ve  had  the  growth  of  point-to-point  carriers  and  the 
hub-and-spoke legacy companies have wanted to change their busi-
ness  model  some  and  so  many  of  them  have  gone  through  bank-
ruptcy  to  strip  assets  and  they’re  now  coming  out  of  bankruptcy 
and are shrinking capacity. They are, I think, one of you said that 
airports  with  three  to  six  daily  flights—that’s  a  town  of  50,000, 
maybe  100,000  people,  three  to  six  daily  flights,  a  33  percent  de-
cline  in  departures.  We’re  experiencing  that  all  across  the  country 
with  those  small  communities.  This  isn’t  EAS.  These  are  other 
communities that are larger than EAS. 

That’s  a  serious  problem.  And  the  hub-and-spoke  and  the  point- 
to-point  are  in  basic  conflict  and  if  the  legacy  carriers  that  have 
created the hub-and-spoke system no longer have a commitment to 
the  spoke  and  want  to  dramatically  reduce  departures,  downsize 
the  aircraft  and  so  on,  we  will  continue  to  see  a  diminished  capa-
bility  of  providing  service  to  smaller  cities  in  this  country  and  the 
inevitable  result  will  be  an  exacerbated  problem  of  parts  of  this 
country  having  wonderful  air  service  with  great  equipment  and 
many  different  pricing  capabilities  of  lower  prices  and  more  alter-
natives  with  respect  to  schedules  and  then  we’ll  see  a  whole  tier 
of  other  communities  and  I’ve  got  them  in  North  Dakota.  I  mean, 
Minot  and  Bismarck  and  other  communities—Grand  Forks,  Fargo, 
where you will see, I think, diminished airline service. 

I know that the carriers will say, no, that’s not where we’re head-
ed  but  look  at  the  facts.  I  think  the  airline  system  in  our  country 
is experiencing serious problems in any event. This morning, I saw 
the  report  that  30  percent  of  the  departures  on  airlines  in  this 
country  were  late  departures.  I  believe  that  was  the  past  month. 
Mr. Steinberg, do you know when that is for? 

But  at  any  rate,  30  percent  late.  The  system  is  being  stretched. 
Air  traffic  controllers—we’ve  got  lots  and  lots  of  problems  and  I 
know  that  this  hearing  is  about  one  slice  of  that  and  that  is,  the 
Essential  Air  Service  issue,  the  Small  Community  Grant  Program 
and  what  we  do  to  try  to  make  sure  that  continues  to  work.  But 
I think if we do that in isolation without understanding the inher-
ent conflict of what’s happening between the hub-and-spoke system 
created by the legacy carriers and their need now, to compete with 
the  point-to-point  carriers  and  what  that’s  going  to  mean  to  com-
munities—we,  it  seems  to  me,  we’re  going  to  end  up  here  with 
quite a mess on our hands. So I’m not suggesting I know all of the 
answers  but  I  certainly  think  we  need  to  confront  this  basic  prob-
lem. 

Mr. Courtney, what—is it Lynchburg, Virginia? 
Mr. COURTNEY. Yes, sir. 
Senator DORGAN. And how big is Lynchburg? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

30 

Mr. COURTNEY. Our service area, including the four counties sur-

rounding Lynchburg is 220,000. 

Senator  DORGAN.  That  market—100,000,  200,000  that  market  is 
exactly the market that I think is headed toward trouble. With in-
creased or I should say, substantially decreased service with lesser 
equipment and fewer frequencies and higher prices. 

We’ve  done  study  and  after  study  about  the  pricing.  The  pricing 
is  unbelievable.  I’ve  held  up  charts  in  this  Committee,  a  chart  of 
Salem  Sue,  the  biggest  cow  in  America.  It  sits  on  a  big  hill  over 
Salem,  North  Dakota  and  a  picture  of  Mickey  Mouse  and  said,  do 
you  want  to  go  see  Mickey  Mouse  and  visit  Disney  World?  Well, 
here’s  the  cost.  Want  to  go  see  the  biggest  cow  on  a  hill  in  New 
Salem,  North  Dakota?  Half  as  far?  It  will  cost  you  twice  as  much. 
I did that just for effect. 

But  it  is  a  fact  that  if  you’re  in  Lynchburg  or  you’re  in  Minot  or 
in  dozens  and  dozens  and  dozens  of  places  in  this  country,  in  my 
judgment, you are being cheated with the fare system in this coun-
try  with  the  airlines  that’s  not  fair  to  a  substantial  number  of  the 
American citizens. 

So  at  any  rate,  I  agree  with  Senator  Stevens.  The  Essential  Air 
Service  is  very  important.  It’s  a  very  important  program  and  we 
need  to  get  it  right.  I  was  the  one  that  offered  the  amendment  in 
this  Committee  many  years  ago  that  provided  funding  outside  of 
the  yearly  appropriations  process  by  connecting  it  to  over  flight 
fees.  So,  I  mean,  I’ve  also  paid  my  dues  in  terms  of  trying  to  sup-
port this program and make this program work. 

This Committee has a lot to do to try to draw a line and connect 
the dots between Essential Air Service between those mid-size mar-
kets and between the robust, aggressive competition that’s going on 
in  the  major  markets  in  this  country  that  offer  good  service  at  de-
cent  prices  for  people  who  are  fortunate  enough  to  live  in  those 
areas. Senator Vitter? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator VITTER. Thank you. I want to thank Vice Chairman Ste-
vens  also  for  this  hearing  and  for  all  of  his  interest  and  others  on 
the panel for their interest. It certainly affects Louisiana. We have 
many  small  and  rural  communities.  Right  now,  as  we  speak,  none 
of  those  participate  in  the  EAS  program  but  that  can  change 
monthly. So it certainly will in the future. 

I’m a supporter of that program. I voted for the Vision 100 Reau-
thorization  Act  and  certainly  look  forward  to  continue  to  work  to 
improve  and  make  that  program  more  robust.  I’m  also  a  big  sup-
porter  of  the  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development  Program 
and  certainly,  several  significant  Louisiana  airports  have  partici-
pated  in  that  grant  program  in  the  past.  I  think  Lake  Charles, 
Shreveport,  Lafayette,  Alexandria,  Monroe.  So  count  me  in  terms 
of my interest and my commitment to improving this. 

I  wanted  to  ask  a  very  specific  question  for  obvious  reasons  and 
I’ll  start  with  Mr.  Steinberg.  One  very  specific  situation  and  inter-
est—this can impact on occasion, is evacuation during emergencies 
like  hurricanes,  like  Katrina  and  Rita.  In  the  last  couple  years 
since Katrina, Homeland Security has done a lot of additional plan-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

31 

ning about all sorts of things, including air evacuation. I think that 
has been focused on big airports, like New Orleans, big planes. Has 
there  been  any  interaction  with  you  and  this  program  with  regard 
to using air assets out of smaller facilities? 

Mr.  STEINBERG.  Thank  you,  Senator.  The  Department  of  Trans-
portation,  of  course,  is  closely  involved  with  DHS  in  preparing  for 
this  hurricane  season,  which  so  far,  of  course,  has  mercifully  been 
not too bad yet. 

We  have  an  ongoing  discussion  with  them  about  air  evacuation. 
To  my  knowledge,  we  have  not  discussed  smaller  airports  and 
smaller  aircraft,  if  that’s  where  you’re  going  toward.  During  the 
Katrina  evacuation,  there  was  sort  of  a  mix  of  both  large  airlines 
and then sort of on-the-spot smaller aircraft helping out as well. 

What  I’d  like  to  do  is  follow  up  and  see  what  discussions  have 
been had with DHS specifically about smaller airports and get back 
to you. 

Senator  VITTER.  If  you  could  do  that  and  obviously,  it  has  to 
start with big airports and big planes. I’m not begrudging that. But 
I do think there needs to be some discussion and planning with re-
gard  to  smaller  airports  as  well  in  terms  of  local  communities  de-
pending  on  where  a  particular  hurricane,  for  instance,  may  be 
going. 

For  the  whole  panel,  does  anyone  have  any  reaction  to  those 
sorts  of  issues  with  regard  to  keeping  service  in  smaller  commu-
nities viable? I just invite anybody’s comments. 

Ms.  MALARKEY.  From  the  air  carrier  perspective,  again,  one  of 
the  significant  impacts  on  smaller  communities  receiving  air  serv-
ice are the costs and it’s not just the sort of the labor costs and the 
fuel  costs  but  it’s  also,  to  some  extent,  some  government  imposed 
costs.  So  we  always  ask  that  the  Congress  bear  in  mind  that 
when—anytime there is an increased cost on the carriers that that 
is  something  that  will  drive  the  fares  up  that  it  makes  continuing 
that  small  community  air  service  ever  more  expensive  and  so  we 
ask that cost increases be made with those circumstances in mind. 
Senator  VITTER.  Ms.  Malarkey,  are  you—you  may  not  be  aware 
of it but are you aware of specific discussions and planning sessions 
with  regard  to  your  member  airlines  regarding  evacuation  sce-
narios? 

Ms.  MALARKEY.  No,  I’m  afraid  that’s  an  area  I  don’t  know  too 

much about but I will commit to get back to you on that. 

Senator VITTER. Right. Thank you very much. Anyone else? 
Mr.  COURTNEY.  Well,  I  guess  for  Lynchburg,  the  ongoing  issue 
for us seems to be a downward spiral in terms of service levels that 
have  been  exacerbated  by  increasingly  higher  fares.  We  clearly 
have a capture—we have a marketplace that has little competition 
and as a result, with the legacy carriers in particular, with services 
that are provided by their affiliates that the mainline carriers con-
trol  all  the  seats,  the  schedule,  the  flights.  We  end  up,  as  I  said 
before,  being  such  a  relatively  small  revenue  piece  of  the  revenue 
pie  for  the  main  airline  that  we  can’t  get  enough  attention  from 
them. But this spiral that we’ve had of increasing fares because we 
tend  to  have  a  high  percentage  of  business  travelers  but  then  as 
we have performed better—I’ll give you one example. A while back, 
we  had  a  $60  overall  average  fare  differential  between  Lynchburg 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

32 

and  Roanoke  that  was  about  50  miles  away,  about  an  hour’s  drive 
and we went to the airline to try to get them to provide some par-
ity.  We  also,  at  the  same  time,  were  realizing  that  our  passenger 
load factors had gone up to 70 percent. 

Well, when we went back to the airlines to try to get them to re-
duce—to  add  service  because  of  the  response  of  the  marketplace 
and  increase  in  service,  despite  the  higher  fares,  they  just  raised 
their fares even more. We’ve seen that over and over again. 

And  also,  I  realize  there’s  cost  from  our  standpoint  in  dealing 
with  airline  planning  departments,  costs  that  are  always  a  factor 
for the airlines. But when it comes to planning decisions, I’ve found 
that they don’t use costs at all when it comes to making a decision 
on  whether  to  provide  service  to  my  airport  because  we  already 
tend to be a very high revenue airport for them. 

This  Catch-22  that  we’re  facing  right  now  is  what  is  really  frus-
trating. When we were told by Delta Airlines, the Delta Connection 
that  they  were  going  to  reduce  one  of  our  three  daily  departures, 
our  three  daily  RJs  to  Atlanta,  despite  the  loads  we  were  gener-
ating,  they  said  that  we’re  not  generating  a  high  enough  average 
of  passengers  to  match  what  they  are  doing  system-wide.  For  in-
stance,  they’re  doing  system-wide  load  factors  of  80  percent.  Ours 
are in the upper 60s. But of course, we can never attain 80 percent 
because  as  soon  as  we  get  into  the  70s,  they  raise  fares  and  it 
brings  the  load  factor  right  down  so  we’re  caught  in  a  Catch-22 
here that results in a spiral. 

We’ll  be  down  to  six  flights  per  day.  Now  granted,  after  Sep-
tember  11  or  before  September  11,  we  had  19  daily  departures,  a 
lot  of  19-seat  aircraft.  We  have  RJ  service  and  we  have  37  to  50 
seat  turboprop  aircraft  now,  so  much  better  quality.  But  we’ll  be 
down to six flights, six daily departures as of September. Our seat 
capacity  will  be  from  just  under  500  to  267.  We’ve  had  such  tre-
mendous  decrease  and  I  just  worry  that  we’re  going  to  get  in  this 
downward spiral—we can only lose so much more before we end up 
having  Delta  pull  out  completely  and  then  we’ll  be  stuck  with  one 
airline. 

Then,  because  of  equipment  challenges,  whatever—that  we  may 
end up going down further. You have to have a basic amount, level 
of  service  to  be  able  to  provide  a  critical  mass  of  service  and  we’re 
at  the  bottom  now  and  that’s  one  of  the  reasons  I’m  here  because 
we need programs like this. We need some extra oomph to be able 
to get the attention. We’ve had a lot of frustration with United Air-
lines in trying to get service to Dulles. 

Under  our  new  grant,  $405,000  incentive  package,  an  affiliate 
RA member, Culligan Airways or Culligan Air, has expressed inter-
est in taking advantage of that program and to add service to Dul-
les but there has not been sufficient parking space at Washington/ 
Dulles Airport. 

And  without  that  space  and  of  course,  this  is  for  a  33-seat,  30- 
seat  turboprop  airplane.  When  they  have  constraints  on  parking, 
it’s  not  going  to  go  to  a  30-seat  airplane  from  Lynchburg.  So  we 
seem  to  come  upon  one  obstacle  after  another,  even  though  we 
have a strong, viable, profitable market for our size. 

Ms.  MILLER.  Senator,  in  Columbia,  Boone  County,  Missouri,  our 
emergency  operation  plan  does  not  include  the  airlines  as  far  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

33 

evacuation.  I  also  serve  on  the  Senior  State  and  Local  Advisory 
Committee  for  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  advise 
the  Department  from  that  perspective  and  I  know  Herb  Kelleher 
from  Southwest  Airlines  is  on  the  private  sector  part  of  that.  You 
might want to touch base with him to see what kind of interactions 
have been happening with the Department and the airline industry 
as far as evacuations. 

Senator  VITTER.  Great.  Thank  you.  OK,  thank  you.  That’s  all  I 

have. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Snowe? 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you  and  I  want  thank  the  panel  as  well. 
I’m  sorry  I  wasn’t  able  to  listen  to  your  testimony  here  this  morn-
ing because it is a critical issue that we recognize, those of us who 
represent small communities in our rural states, that Essential Air 
Service  is  absolutely  pivotal  to  rural  development  and  to  rural 
economies and even more so today. 

As  we  see  the  disparities  that  exist  between  urban  and  rural 
areas  where  we’re  losing  thousands  and  thousands  of  jobs  and 
that’s certainly been true in many manufacturing areas where air-
ports become vital. 

We have four Essential Air Service airports in Maine and we rep-
resent  four  of  the  145  communities  across  this  country.  I  think 
frankly,  there  has  to  be  adjustments  in  our  Federal  policy  that’s 
going to make it fairer and reconcile some of the issues that I think 
that will give impetus to growth, economic growth in areas and bol-
stering these local airports. At a time in which I think we are see-
ing  a  revival  in  regional  jet  service  and  very  light  jets.  I  mean, 
we’re  seeing  a  revival  in  small  aircraft  that  is  going  to  be  central, 
I think, to the economies throughout this country, not just in urban 
areas. Another thing, we should be enhancing and expanding upon 
it. 

I know this has been a major struggle for a long time that as one 
who has sat on this Committee since I came to the Senate in 1995 
and even before then, serving in the House for 16 years, you know, 
since  deregulation  and  I  certainly  lived  it  and  experienced  it  since 
1978, when I came to the Congress in 1979. But Essential Air Serv-
ice was designed to help the rural communities to make that tran-
sition  and  so,  I  think  we  have  a  responsibility  at  the  Federal  level 
to  ensure  that  we  can  craft  Federal  policy  that’s  going  to  help  to 
elevate the under-served regions of the country. 

Then as Senator Vitter indicated here today, talking about those 
issues  that  make  a  difference  and  how  we  can  enhance  that 
through  various  initiatives.  That’s  why  I’m  supporting  legislation 
and  I’d  like  to  ask  you,  Mr.  Steinberg,  because  I  think  it  is  impor-
tant,  to  get  to  some  of  the  specifics  about  these  issues  that  really 
have handicapped small communities. 

The  legislation  that  I  have  joined  with  Senator  Bingaman,  Sen-
ator  Hagel  and  Senator  Ben  Nelson,  would  provide  communities 
with  valuable  tools  that  they  need  to  secure  their  local  airports. 
We’ve  seen  that  the  Federal  Government  has  imposed  passenger 
caps,  subsidy  caps  through  questionable  formulas  that  are  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

34 

stantly  changing,  imprudent  cost  sharing  requirements,  which  we 
fought  consistently.  Our  bill  would  eliminate  the  long  un-enforced 
cost  sharing  requirements  and  also  to  inject  some  reality  with  the 
passenger  subsidy  CAB,  indexing  it  to  inflation,  which  we  think  is 
critical. Recognizing that a $200 passenger CAB really does inhibit 
small  communities  because  it  doesn’t  adjust  for,  for  example,  avia-
tion fuel growth. 

We’ve seen a lot of the legacy airlines that are consolidating and 
merging,  losing  their  profitability  because  of  the  soaring  costs  in 
aviation fuel. So that certainly is an indication to me of the impact 
it’s having even on smaller aircraft and smaller airports. 

Also,  to  solidify  the  manner  in  which  we  deal  with  the  commu-
nities  who  must  deal  with  the  subsidy  cap,  with  having  more  of  a 
sliding scale other than the fact of you—if you come one under the 
$10,000  enplanement,  you  get  a  $150,000.  If  you  go  $10,000  be-
yond,  you  get  a  million  dollar  subsidy  from  the  Federal  Govern-
ment. It seems to me we should have some type of middle ground. 
So,  Mr.  Steinberg,  is  the  Administration  prepared  to  accept  any 
of these types of changes to modify existing laws, since for example, 
on the subsidy CAB, there has been no change since 1990? 

Mr. STEINBERG. Thank you, Senator. I’d like to answer the ques-
tion  this  way.  First,  let  me  start  with  what  our  proposal  was  be-
cause  we,  too,  have  abandoned,  if  you  will,  the  cost  sharing  pro-
posal  that  was  put  forward  in  prior  reauthorization  packages  and 
our proposal this year was to limit the program not by affecting the 
individual  communities  through  cost  sharing  but  by  capping  the 
program  in  terms  of  the  cities  that  are  currently  in  it  would  be 
grandfathered  and  we  wouldn’t  add  cities.  You  know,  we’re  30 
years beyond deregulation and so it’s hard to argue that a city that 
might lose service, say tomorrow, lost service as a result of deregu-
lation in 1978. So we think it’s appropriate to cap the program. 

The other thing that we’ve proposed is to rank cities in terms of 
just  how  isolated  they  are  from  large  or  medium  airports  and  to 
use  whatever  funds  the  Congress  chooses  to  authorize  and  appro-
priate  to  us  by  working  down  the  list  from  the  most  needy,  if  you 
will, to the least needy. 

In  terms  of  the  idea  of  indexing  the  subsidy  to  inflation,  I  think 
you make a good point about fuel costs and the legacy carriers. But 
the  fact  is  that  we  haven’t,  as  a  government,  chosen  to  subsidize 
legacy  carrier  fuel  costs  and  the  fuel  costs  going  up  as  much  as 
they  did  and  the  inability  of  the  legacy  network  airlines  to  pass 
those  costs  on  to  their  customers  is—was  a  major  factor  in  several 
of  the  bankruptcies.  So  I  think  we  have  to  be  cautious  about  sub-
sidizing one part of the airline system versus another. A lot of sub-
sidies can have unintended consequences. 

I’d also note that the subsidy used to be $300 and Congress low-
ered  it  to  $200,  I  think  in  1989  and  so,  obviously  there  was  some 
thought  at  that  point  that  the  subsidy  did  not  need  to  be  higher. 
Senator  SNOWE.  But  you  can  understand  why  it  would  need  to 

be changed today? 

Mr.  STEINBERG.  Well,  you  know,  it  has  a—really,  all  this  gets 
down  to  basic  airline  economics.  If  it’s,  clearly  if  the  subsidy,  the 
cap  is  increased,  our  costs  will  go  up.  But  it’s  also  important  to 
note  that  when  costs  go  down,  our  subsidy  payment  doesn’t  go 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

35 

down.  That’s  not  the  way  the  program  is  structured.  It’s  a  fixed 
price  program.  So  if  fuel  were  to  drop  dramatically  tomorrow,  we 
would not be able to go back to the carriers and say, give us some 
of that subsidy back. So if you were going to do that, I think you’d 
have  to  really  revamp  the  program  so  the  government  and  tax-
payers  got  the  benefit  of  cost  reductions  as  well  as  having  to,  if 
they had to pay for cost increases. 

Senator  SNOWE.  So  is  the  Administration  prepared  to  accept 

some changes in the program? 

Mr. STEINBERG. I think we clearly indicated our willingness to do 
that  by—we  tried  to  put  forward  a  proposal  this  year  and  like  I 
said, it did not go down the cost sharing route. We welcome the op-
portunity to work with the Congress on something that works bet-
ter. Whatever amount you choose to fund the program, we want to 
make  sure  it’s  as  effective  as  possible  and  so,  yes.  Of  course  and 
one other point, if I could, Senator. 

I  think  several  of  the  witnesses  today  and  Senator  Dorgan  and 
others  on  the  Committee  have  talked  about  the  price  differential 
between smaller cities and say, Los Angeles, for example and that’s 
a  fact.  I  mean,  there’s  no  doubt  about  it.  But  another  fact  is  that 
as our network airlines have lost so much money over the last sev-
eral  years;  they  had  to  reduce  service.  So  the  phenomenon  that 
goes on say, at a Lynchburg can’t be looked at just in isolation. 

When  Congress  deregulated  the  airline  industry,  it  told  us  to  do 
a  bunch  of  things  at  the  same  time.  One  was  to  lower  fares.  But 
another was to ensure comprehensive service to small communities 
and a third was to ensure that well managed air carriers—and this 
is  a  direct  quote,  ‘‘earn  adequate  profits  and  attract  capitol.’’  Well, 
those things are all interrelated. When you have well managed air 
carriers  that  don’t  make  adequate  profits  and  file  for  bankruptcy, 
then  of  course  as  they  go  through  that  process,  they  start  pulling 
down the least profitable service, which very frequently is at small-
er communities. 

So these problems need to be looked at in a comprehensive way. 
If you just address one part, you’re going to inevitably mess up an-
other. 

Senator SNOWE. The whole idea of the isolated proposal you were 
suggesting  with  the  210  miles,  is  it?  I  mean,  that  would  basically 
eliminate three of our four Essential Air Service airports in Maine. 
I just think that that is discriminatory, frankly, in the rural areas. 
It’s  in  the  Federal  Government’s  interests  to  ensure  that  there  is 
viability of these smaller airports. 

Mr. STEINBERG. I certainly agree with that. 
Senator  SNOWE.  It’s  far  different  than  where  we  were  30  years 
ago and 25 years ago, even 10 years ago that we’re seeing that this 
service  is  absolutely  crucial  to  the  survival  of  rural  regions  of  this 
country and I think the Federal Government has to make its mind 
up and is prepared to support it. I mean, we’re not giving an abun-
dance of support here. 

Mr. STEINBERG. I think it’s a question of how the support is pro-
vided and going to the point you made earlier, which I thought was 
very salient. With the smaller aircraft coming online, this is some-
thing  I  said  in  my  opening  statement,  I  think  there  is  some  prom-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

36 

ise, frankly, for better non-subsidized service that meets your needs 
and the needs of folks that live in rural America. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  thank  you.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman. 

Thank you. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you. Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  I  thank  Chair-
man  Rockefeller  and  Senator  Lott  for  holding  this  hearing.  I  hap-
pen  to  agree  that  safe,  reliable  and  affordable  air  service  is  vital 
for  doing  business  in  states  all  across  this  country  and  in  rural 
states  like  South  Dakota.  Our  state’s  aviation  industry  shortens 
the  long  distances  from  point  to  point  and  contributes  about  $52 
million  annually  to  our  economy  and  an  integral  part  of  aviation 
in  my  state  of  South  Dakota  is  Essential  Air  Service  Program.  We 
have  four  communities  that  participate  in  the  EAS  Program, 
Pierre,  Huron,  Brookings  and  Watertown  and  that  EAS  Program 
hasn’t  seen  any  major  change  since  its  inception  after  airline  de-
regulation  and  I  know  that  as  I  said,  mine  is  not  the  only  state 
that’s  affected  by  this  or  would  be  impacted  by  any  proposed 
changes. 

I  have  a  couple  of  questions  that  I  would  like  to  get  at  that  are 
specific  to  the  situation  in  my  state  and  then  maybe  a  couple  of 
questions that are more general. 

But as you may or may not know, I introduced legislation earlier 
this  year  that  was  included  in  the  FAA  Reauthorization  that 
passed  out  of  the  Committee.  It  extends  the  provision,  Section  409 
of  the  2002  FAA  Reauthorization,  commonly  referred  to  as  Vision 
100. What is does, is the provision ensures that certain mileage cal-
culations  that  determine  EAS  program  eligibility  are  not  simply 
measured  by  someone  here  in  Washington,  D.C.,  but  in  fact,  cer-
tified by state Governors. 

There  are,  of  course,  budgetary  strains,  as  we  all  know  on  the 
Essential  Air  Service  Program  but  I  believe  we  should  be  focusing 
on  strengthening  the  program  and  examining  the  air  service  it  is 
supporting to make sure it’s truly essential and today’s hearing, of 
course, is part of that effort. But we shouldn’t allow people behind 
a  desk  in  Washington,  D.C.  to  surreptitiously  use  mileage  deter-
minations to cut the costs of the program and reduce air service in 
the process. 

The  specific  example  I’m  referring  to  in  my  state  is  Brookings, 
South  Dakota.  It’s  a  community  that  would  more  than  likely  have 
lost  its  commercial  air  service  if  this  provision  was  not  in  place  5 
years ago. So I hope that we can get that provision extended again 
in this reauthorization process so communities like Brookings don’t 
lose their air service in this manner. 

I  guess  the  question  I  have  is  if  any  of  the  witnesses  have  any 
comments  on  the  distances  used  in  the  Essential  Air  Service  Pro-
gram.  As  you  know,  an  EAS  community  must  be  more  than  70 
miles  from  a  large  or  medium  hub  airport  and  if  they  are  more 
than  210  miles,  then  the  subsidy  can  be  over  $200  per  passenger. 
Do those distances still make sense? Should there be any changes? 
And  again,  I  would  come  back,  hearken  back  to  the  way  this  was 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

37 

constructed  5  years  ago  and  that  is  that  the  Governors  would  be 
in  a  position  to  certify  some  of  those  mileages  because  if  it’s  left 
to the FAA here in Washington, they will find, somehow using back 
roads and trails, a shorter distance from Minneapolis to Brookings 
to fit under the 210 mile distance. 

But  that  being  the  case,  again,  I  just  pose  that  question  of  our 
witnesses—comments  on  the  distances,  do  those  distances  still 
make sense and could you give us your thoughts on that, I’d appre-
ciate it. 

Ms.  MALARKEY.  Senator,  I’d  like  to  address  your  first  comment 
about  the  state  determined  distances  versus  the  FAA  determined 
distances and just thank you for bringing that to our attention. You 
have  our  support  on  that.  We  believe  that  is  appropriate  and  we 
support you in your efforts to continue that provision. 

In  terms  of  the  mileage,  the  distances  that  determine  the  eligi-
bility,  we  don’t  have  a  position  on  that,  other  than  to  say  that  we 
realize that the program has not been re-examined since its incep-
tion  and  at  some  point,  some  redrawing  of  the  distance  criteria 
may  be  appropriate.  But  in  doing  so,  we  want  to  caution  that  first 
off,  any  point  that  is  eliminated,  any  revenues  that  are  saved  by 
that, be put back into the program to ensure the revenue neutrality 
so  we  don’t  have  politically  driven  reasons  of  eliminating  routes 
and then just to cut the funding for the program. 

Second, we would like to have some sort of a setup like a BRAC 
or  something  like  that,  that  would  ensure  the  fairness  of  those 
points. 

But again, we would much rather have sort of an informed proc-
ess  that  looks  at  this  rather  than  having  DOT  cut  the  points  by  a 
crisis of funding. 

Senator THUNE. Anybody else? Here, come on up. 
Mr.  STEINBERG.  If  I  could  comment  on  it.  We  are,  of  course, 
aware of the situation with Brookings and I just want to point out 
a  few  things.  One  is  that,  of  course,  the  legislation  that  you  re-
ferred to covered, in effect, not just Brookings but some other cities 
as  well  and  those  cities  are  sometimes  held  up  to  me  as  examples 
of the EAS Program perhaps not being as well focused as it should 
be. 

So  for  example,  Hagerstown,  Maryland  is  covered  as  a  result  of 
that  legislation—you  know,  when  my  wife  and  I  drive  there  to  the 
shopping  outlet  mall,  so  it’s  not  all  that  far  from—it’s  a  very  dif-
ferent  situation,  if  you  will,  from  what  you  have  in  your  state.  So 
I think our concern about that legislation is frankly, more directed 
to other places. 

Generally speaking, we don’t actually do this surreptitiously that 
the map is simply a calculation of driving distance, shortest driving 
distance  and  you  can  go  to  Mapquest  or  Google  Maps  or  whatever 
and it is what it is. It’s very factual. If you go to a system in which 
you look at the most commonly traveled route, that to me, becomes 
much more subjective and at the end of the day, I think from a con-
sumer  perspective,  most  people  are  concerned  about  their  time  as 
opposed to the number of miles that they travel. So as we’ve added 
new  highways  and  so  on  and  they  may  be  a  bit  longer  but  they 
may have shorter driving time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

38 

Fundamentally, it’s up to Congress to decide ultimately what the 
right  cutoff  should  be.  By  definition,  all  of  these  cutoffs  are  arbi-
trary.  So  if  it’s  200  miles,  you’re  going  to  affect  some  cities.  If  it’s 
210,  you’re  going  to  affect  others.  That  really  is  a—it’s  a  decision 
that  needs  to  be  made  by  the  Congress.  We’ve  put  out  a  proposal 
that would stick with the 210 but again, we’re not trying to do this 
in a surreptitious fashion. We’ve not singled out any specific cities. 
But  whatever  changes  we  make,  I  think,  need  to  go  to  the  funda-
mental issue of what—how many cities do we want to cover overall. 
Senator  THUNE.  Anybody  else  have  any  comments  on  that?  No? 

That covers the subject? 

Well,  I  think  the  concern,  of  course,  that  we  have  is  that  the 
Governor  in  2002—the  Governors  were  given  discretion  to  deter-
mine whether or not—whether these distances fell within the allot-
ted—and  I’m  not  sure  how  you  came  up  with  210  miles,  what  the 
magic  is  behind  that  but  in  the  Act  that  we  passed  in  2002  and 
I  was  a  member  of  the  House  at  the  time,  the  Governors  had  the 
authority  to  make  judgments  about  certifying  those  distances  and 
I  think  the  concern  is  that  under  a  scenario  where  that’s  not  the 
case  that  someone  here  might  decide  to  construct  a  different  route 
between  two  communities  that  would  come  up  with  a  different 
mileage.  I  think  that’s  what  the  concern  obviously  is  and  so,  my 
hope would be that we at least, in terms of who makes that deter-
mination,  would  allow  the  Governors  to  continue  to  be  controlling 
in  determining  distances  and  whether  or  not  a  particular  commu-
nity is going to fall within or outside of the 210 mile limit. 

Let me ask just more generally with regard to the EAS Program. 
There are a number of communities in that program are now about 
150  and  I  guess—is  that  number  continuing  to  grow?  And  as  we 
see  more  communities  coming  in  to  the  Essential  Air  Service  Pro-
gram, are we seeing an increase in the number of air carriers serv-
ing EAS communities? Why or why not and what changes could we 
make  to  the  EAS  Program  that  would  increase  the  attractiveness 
this  program  would  have  toward  smaller  air  carriers?  And  I  guess 
Mr.  Steinberg,  Ms.  Malarkey,  whoever  would  care  to  comment  on 
that. 

Ms.  MALARKEY.  I  think  it’s  a  certainty  that  in  the  coming  years 
that  additional  communities  will  be  added  to  the  EAS  roles.  Mr. 
Courtney  discussed  the  situation—at  his  community—we  don’t  see 
his  community  going  into  the  EAS  Program  in  the  next  few  years, 
not  to  worry.  However,  his  comments  did  illuminate  the  situation 
and  as  I  said  in  my  opening  statement,  not  just  the  EAS  commu-
nities but the smallest communities are losing their air service and 
any  community,  really,  can  become  an  EAS,  as  you  all  know,  sim-
ply  by  getting  down  to  one  carrier  that  wants  to  exit  the  market. 
So  yes,  to  answer  your  first  question,  that  is  something  that  we 
see. 

One of the significant market—the barriers to market entry that 
I  talked  about  in  my  statement  is  the  inability  to  finance  the  air-
craft.  We  get  a  lot  of  questions  from  Senators  and  from  commu-
nities  that  say,  why  aren’t  there  any  new  EAS  carriers,  new  en-
trant  EAS  carriers  and  one  of  the  reasons  is,  a  2-year  contract  is 
a  relatively  short  contract  and  when  the  carriers  are  trying  to  se-
cure financing for aircraft, that is a significant detriment. So that’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

39 

why  we  were  pleased  with  the  initial  enthusiasm  that  this  Com-
mittee has shown. I think there’s a statement in the FAA reauthor-
ization that would extend those contracts and we think that’s quite 
important. 

Mr.  STEINBERG.  Can  I  add  to  that?  Senator,  it’s  a  good  question 
and it’s something that troubles us a lot, the growth of the program 
because clearly, the program was intended to be a stopgap or safety 
net after deregulation. It wasn’t intended originally to be a perma-
nent  fixture  and  the  hope  was  that  the  marketplace  would  work 
better than it has worked for smaller communities. 

If you exclude Alaska and Hawaii, in the last 10 years or so, the 
program has grown 50 percent in terms of the number of cities cov-
ered,  from  about  60  to  about  100  and  the  cost  of  that  has  quad-
rupled from about $23 million to about $90 to $100 million. 

And  why  has  that  happened?  Again,  I  think  it’s  the  same  phe-
nomenon  I  spoke  of  earlier,  which  is  the  service  to  small  commu-
nities’ works when you have large network airlines that can profit-
ably  serve  those  spokes,  that  ultimately  what  you  want  is  not  a 
subsidized  service.  You  want  good,  commercial  service  at  reason-
able rates. 

As  our  network  carriers  have  hemorrhaged  money,  they’ve—it’s 
not that they don’t want to serve smaller communities. They just— 
they do this on a network basis so they look at which city contrib-
utes  the  most  to  the  network,  which  contributes  the  least  and  the 
fact is, they can make more money or lose less money serving larg-
er markets. 

Probably  the  single  most  important  thing  you  could  do  if  you 
wanted  to  increase  service  to  smaller  communities  is  to  have  a 
healthy network airline industry. Today, we don’t have any airline 
that  serves  every  point  in  this  country,  so  we  don’t  have  com-
prehensive  network  airlines.  We  have  six  or  so  smaller  network 
airlines.  So  that,  to  me,  is  the  nub  of  the  problem.  We’ll  never  get 
out of this problem that we’re in until we address that. 

The program has not grown dramatically in the last year. I think 
it’s stabilized and we’ve had several communities actually come out 
of EAS, particularly in Hawaii. So right now, it’s still about 145 cit-
ies.  But  again,  we’re  now  in  a  situation  where  the  airlines  are 
breaking  even.  Some  of  them  are  making  some  money.  The  next 
downturn,  I  think  you’ll  see  a  return  to  the  same  situation.  That’s 
the problem that needs to be addressed. 

In  terms  of  the  length  of  the  contract  terms,  we’ve  actually  had 
carriers  tell  us  that  they  want  the  shorter  terms  so  some  of  this 
is  driven  by  what  the  participants  want.  The  downside,  if  you 
change the contract terms and say, the Secretary shall have 4 year 
contract  terms,  yes,  you  might  get  more  bidders  on  the  front  end 
but then if service declines or your communities are not happy with 
the service, it makes it harder for us to get some more competition 
in  there.  So  there  is  a  tradeoff  if  you  go  to  longer-term  contracts. 

Senator THUNE. Thank you. 
Ms.  MILLER.  Senator?  I’d  like  to  say,  I  believe  that  if  there  was 
dedicated  funding  for  this  program,  guaranteed,  it  would  help  the 
market also. It would give other carriers the confidence that should 
they  bid  in  this  market,  the  EAS  market,  that  the  funding  would 
be  there  for  a  long-term  program,  whether  it’s  this  community  or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

40 

another  community,  if  this  community  is  able  to  succeed  without 
EAS service. 

I just want to give you an example. When I was President of the 
National Association of Counties, I traveled all the time out of Co-
lumbia,  Boone  County.  I  got  home.  I  was  10  minutes  from  home 
and  now  I’m  2  hours  from  the  St.  Louis  Airport.  But—and  it  was 
$60 round trip, connecting to American Airlines. Today, it’s $69 one 
way  and  they  were  trying  to  go  to  St.  Louis  and  it  was  a  different 
concourse so you had to re-screen to go back in through to connect 
to  American  so  consequently,  that  hurt  our  enplanements  and  we 
have found that we were having an hour to 3-hour delay on flights 
and  we’re  not  a  destination  airport  and  they  were  going  to  a  hub 
and  when  you’re  trying  to  connect  and  you’re  an  hour  to  3  hours 
late, you’re going to lose people that even try to use the service. 

That’s  why  in  my  testimony,  I  thought,  it’s  very  important  that 
we  put  some  incentives  in  the  program  for  increasing  the  service 
to  those  communities  so  that  people  can  be  confident  when  they 
book  in  an  EAS  community  like  my  own  right  now,  that  that  air-
line is going to meet the demand, they’re going to be there on time, 
they’re going to get them to their connection. 

And  there  should  be  penalties.  They  should  not  be  paid  when 
they  are  3  hours  late  and  they  miss  all  the  other  flights  and  you 
might  even  have  to  spend  the  night  in  a  lot  of  places,  to  catch  the 
next  flight  because  there  might  be  only  one  more  out  of  that  hub. 
So  I  think  it’s  really  important  that  we  improve  the  service  but 
I  also  think  that  a  dedicated  funding  source  will  enhance  the  op-
portunity for maybe more airlines to get involved in this. 

Senator  THUNE.  Just  one  last  question,  quickly,  if  I  could  and 
this  would  be,  I  guess,  to  Mr.  Steinberg.  What  is  the  on  time,  the 
delay, the cancellation rate for Essential Air Service providers, car-
riers relative to the industry as a whole? 

Mr.  STEINBERG.  I  don’t  have  that  at  the  tip  of  my  tongue.  I  can 
tell  you,  because  we  did  look  into  this  in  advance  of  the  hearing 
that  there  are  relatively  more  complaints  from  passengers  on  EAS 
carriers  than  non-EAS  carriers,  recognizing  however,  that  you’re 
dealing  with  a  very  small  overall  number.  So  roughly—last  year, 
I think there were roughly 60 complaints about EAS service, about 
8,500 on commercial services. If you did the math, it’s a much high-
er  ratio  of  complaints.  My  guess  is  that  given  our  experience  gen-
erally  with  complaints,  most  of  them  have  to  do  with  delays  and 
cancellations. But we can—to the extent we have that data, we can 
get  you  what  we  have.  Some  of  the  carriers  are  too  small  to  fall 
under  our  reporting  requirements  but  we  do  have  about  five  car-
riers or so that are covered. But we can take an IOU and get back 
to you on that. 

Senator  THUNE.  I’d  be  interested  in  knowing.  Thank  you.  Thank 

you, Mr. Chairman. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR [presiding].  Thank  you.  Any  other  Senators  have 

any questions? Any follow-ups? 

We  have  some  Senators  who  could  not  attend  today  because  of 
the busy Senate schedule and other committee meetings and other 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

41 

conflicts, so we’ll give Senators 15 days to submit questions in writ-
ing.  I  may  submit  a  few  myself.  I  was  late  getting  here  but  thank 
you  all.  I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses.  Your  opening  statements 
will be included as part of the record and I assume if you have any 
other  documentation  you  want  to  include,  without  objection,  we’ll 
include that as part of the record as well. But I want to thank you 
all.  Obviously,  Essential  Air  Service  is  something  that  is  very  im-
portant  to  a  lot  of  Senators.  It’s  important  in  my  state  and  you 
heard  just  a  little  taste  of  it  today.  From  what  we  hear  from  our 
constituents  and  from  our  colleagues  about  the  value  of  Essential 
Air  Service,  so  I  just  want  to  thank  you  all  for  being  here  and  ap-
preciate  your  patience  and  your  time.  Thank  you.  The  meeting  is 
adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 11:34 a.m., the hearing was adjourned] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

As  we  all  know,  small  and  rural  communities  are  the  first  to  bear  the  brunt  of 
bad economic times in the aviation industry and the last to see the benefits of good 
times.  Unfortunately,  we  all  know,  the  good  times  in  the  commercial  airline  indus-
try have been infrequent and short. 

The  Government  Accountability  Office  has  confirmed  that  despite  the  return  to 
pre-September  11th  levels  of  passenger  traffic  at  medium  and  large  communities 
small  and  rural  communities  have  not  seen  a  corresponding  increase  in  air  service 
levels. 

The restructuring of the airline industry over the last 5 years has forever changed 

the way we must think about small community air service. 

How  to  address  small  community  air  service  needs  has  been  a  pressing  question 
since  airline  deregulation  almost  thirty  years  ago.  West  Virginia,  like  most  of  the 
states represented on this Committee, has far less air service today than it did prior 
to deregulation. 

At  present,  we  rely  on  two  key  programs,  the  Essential  Air  Service  (EAS)  pro-
gram, which provided subsidized air service to communities under certain conditions 
and the Small Community Air Service Development Program, which I helped create 
in 2000. This program provides grants to communities to develop innovative strate-
gies to improve their air service. 

The  EAS  program  has  always  been  a  critical  air  service  link  for  small  commu-
nities  since  its  inception,  but  it  has  never  really  met  the  true  needs  and  expecta-
tions  of  rural  air  service.  Communities  that  are  dependent  upon  EAS  have  been 
plagued  by  high  fares  and  limited  service  options,  and  in  Congress  it  has  been 
threatened by some Members who look at it is a Federal giveaway. 

The  Small  Community  Air  Service  Development  Program  has  been  successful  in 
helping  communities  across  the  country  build  and  expand  their  air  service  options. 
For  example,  in  my  state,  Greenbrier  Valley  Airport  and  Raleigh  County  Airport 
were able to boost their passenger levels by 27 percent after using their Small Com-
munity  Air  Service  Development  grant  to  initiate  innovative  marketing  strategies 
to attract passengers. 

In  the  2003  FAA  Reauthorization  and  again  in  S.  1300,  the  Aviation  Investment 
and  Modernization  Act  of  2007,  Senator  Lott  and  I  have  worked  to  strengthen  our 
small  community  air  service  programs.  I  am  pleased  that  in  S.  1300  we  were  able 
to  find  a  way  to  increase  funding  levels  for  these  programs  and  actually  guarantee 
some of the funding increase for the EAS program. 

I  know  that  the  DOT  believes  that  new  models  of  providing  air  services  such  as 
on-demand  or  air  taxi  services  may  change  the  way  small  and  rural  communities 
receive air service. I know that some of my own airports believe this as well. 

I certainly want to foster as many options as I can for small community air serv-
ice  and  hope  that  they  will  transform  the  way  my  communities  access  the  national 
aviation system, but we must be realistic. 

Right now, these services do not exist for small and rural communities. They are 
not  a  substitute  for  scheduled  passenger  services  and  will  not  be  for  some  time  to 
come.  We  need  a  strong  financial  commitment  in  the  immediate  future  for  our  cur-
rent programs. 

Finally,  we  must  not  forget  that  without  a  Next  Generation  Air  Traffic  Control 
System  that  allows  for  increased  capacity  at  our  Nation’s  busiest  airports,  we  can 
never increase access to the Nation’s aviation system for small communities. 

I  have  heard  unsubstantiated  complaints  that  the  $25  fee  that  was  included  in 
the  FAA  Reauthorization  bill  could  hurt  small  community  air  service,  but  nothing 
is  farther  from  the  truth.  Without  it,  our  communities  will  not  have  access  to  the 
Nation’s aviation system. I am committed to working with Senator Lott and our col-
leagues on the Finance Committee to develop a fair and equitable financing system 
that will make air travel less expensive for rural consumers. 

(43) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

44 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REGIONAL AVIATION PARTNERS 

Small Community Air Service in Crisis 

Air  Carriers  Opting  to  Abandon  Essential  Air  Service  Markets  Due  to 
Unstable  and  Increasing  Jet  Fuel  Costs  and  the  U.S.  Department’s 
Failure  to  Implement  Key  Provisions  of  Vision  100  to  Compensate 
Carriers for Cost Increases 

In  1987,  51  air  carriers  provided  subsidized  air  service  under  the  Federal  Essen-
tial  Air  Service  (EAS)  program,  by  1995  the  number  of  participating  carriers  had 
dipped dramatically to 17, and by 1999 the number had been further reduced to 11. 
While  the  number  of  carriers  serving  subsidized  markets  rose  to  16  by  2004,  the 
increase was short lived as participating carriers have steadily been exiting the pro-
gram since then, leaving the EAS program with only 8 remaining carriers today re-
sponsible for serving 102 communities in the continental United States. 

The  primary  reason  carriers  are  choosing  to  leave  the  EAS  program  or  signifi-
cantly  reduce  their  exposure  to  the  program,  and  moreover,  the  programs  inability 
to  draw  in  new  carriers,  is  rooted  in  the  inherent  risks  of  serving  small  markets 
and  the  government’s  failure  thus  far  to  adequately  mitigate  those  risks.  Specifi-
cally,  today’s  risks  involve  jet  fuel  costs  which  have  risen  exponentially  and  in-
creased so dramatically that the projected costs used by carriers to bid on EAS com-
munities are commonly exceeded by the time the carrier initiates service or shortly 
thereafter. 
Section  402  (Adjustments  to  Account  for  Significantly  Increased  Costs)  of 

Vision 100 

In Vision 100,1 Congress established Section 402 (Adjustments to Account for Sig-
nificantly Increased Costs) as a means of compensating EAS carriers during the con-
tract  period  for  unforeseen  and  significant  increases  in  operating  costs  primarily 
based on fuel costs alone. However, the DOT has repeatedly stated ‘‘it lacks specific 
funding  and  guidance  from  Congress’’  to  implement  the  provision.  And  for  the  few 
carriers who did apply for the relief, the eligibility criteria provided under the provi-
sion proved to be illusory, ambiguous and unattainable. 

One  of  Section  402’s  primary  faults  lies  in  the  provision’s  requirement  that  car-
riers  demonstrate  a  [10  percent  total  unit  cost]  increase  over  a  period  of  at  least 
two  consecutive  months.  This  total  unit  cost  increase  is  measured  against  those 
costs  included  in  the  carrier’s  bid  proposal.  While  individual  unit  costs  have  in-
creased  significantly,  jet  fuel  for  example  has  risen  more  than  129  percent,  from 
$0.96  per  gallon  on  January  5,  2004  to  $2.20  per  gallon  on  July  31,  2007; 2 this  in-
crease  has  not  translated  into  an  increase  in  total  unit  costs  of  10  percent.  Thus, 
while carriers continue to experience significant losses from individual unit cost in-
creases,  primarily  jet  fuel  costs,  the  10  percent  total  unit  cost  trigger  is  not  met 
based on the DOT model. 

This Situation Is Wholly Unacceptable to Air Service Providers—the trigger mech-
anism is virtually unattainable and results in massive paperwork challenges for the 
carrier  which  serves  to  deter  anyone  from  applying.  It  is  clear  this  was  not  the  in-
tent of Congress in passing the Section 402 language. 

As  a  direct  result  of  the  Department’s  steadfast  reluctance  to  implement  Section 
402,  8  carriers  such  as  Scenic  Airlines  have  been  driven  from  the  program.  Scenic 
states in its 90 day termination notices of May 16, 2006 for Merced and Visalia, CA, 
and Ely, NV: 3 

‘‘Scenic’s  need  to  terminate  service  at  Merced  [Visalia;  Ely]  stems  primarily 
from  fuel  cost  escalations  that  have  undermined  the  economic  viability  of  the 
carrier’s EAS operations.’’ 

Allowing DOT to continue its ‘‘discretionary’’ authority to implement vital changes 
in  legislation  has  a  ‘‘0  percent’’  success  rate  and  never  results  in  relief  for  the  im-
pacted community or air carrier. 
Ninety-Day  Termination  Notices  as  a  Means  of  Seeking  Compensation  for 
Increased Costs Are Disruptive to Air Carriers and Small Communities 
Notwithstanding  the  passing  of  Section  402  (Adjustments  to  Account  for  Signifi-
cantly  Increased  Costs)  legislation  in  Vision  100,  the  DOT  has  stated  publicly  they 

1 Vision 100, The Century of Aviation Reauthorization Act (Pub. L. 108–176) 
2 Vision 100 was enacted on December 12, 2003. January 2004 represents the first full month 
after which Vision 100 became law. January 5, 2004 was the first day in which the U.S. Depart-
ment of Energy recorded a spot price for U.S. Gulf Coast kerosene type jet fuel in 2004. 

3 DOT Docket numbers: OST–1998–3521, OST–2004–19916, and OST–1995–361. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

45 

do  not  have  the  funds  to  implement  the  provision.  Therefore,  the  only  current  re-
course  EAS  carriers  have  in  regards  to  halting  losses  from  significant  increases  in 
jet  fuel  costs  during  the  contract  period  is  to  file  a  90-day  notice  to  terminate  air 
service at an EAS point. This process is disruptive and burdensome for several rea-
sons: 

1.  The  process  exposes  the  incumbent  carrier  to  the  potential  loss  of  market(s) 
as  the  DOT  re-opens  the  bid  process  to  all  carriers.  As  many  EAS  carriers  de-
pend  solely  on  revenues  derived  from  their  EAS  markets  to  stay  in  business, 
these  carriers  are  reluctant  to  file  to  terminate  service  even  if  it  means  oper-
ating  at  a  loss  in  these  markets  to  the  point  of  insolvency  or  even  bankruptcy. 
2. The process is lengthy. Once an air carrier files to terminate service, the DOT 
initiates  a  hold  in  period  during  which  they  do  not  immediately  increase  the 
subsidy amount to reflect increased costs. 
3. Community support for the air service can be diminished. Residents may see 
a  carrier’s  90  day  termination  filing  as  a  sign  of  unreliable  air  service  which 
could  lead  them  to  drive  to  other  nearby  airports.  Furthermore,  fewer  pas-
sengers  flying  out  of  the  EAS  airport  leads  to  higher  annual  subsidy  amounts 
and higher per passenger subsidy rates, potentially resulting in the termination 
of air service by the DOT. 

Prior  and  Current  DOT  Policies  With  Regards  to  Fuel  Cost  Increases  and 

Adjustments 

During the 1980s and into the early 1990s, the Department implemented a policy 
which  recognized  the  detrimental  effects  increased  jet  fuel  cost  had  on  carriers  and 
compensated  EAS  carriers  for  these  costs.  For  example,  Civil  Aeronautics  Board 
(CAB)  Order  82–5130,  Selecting  Essential  Air  Service  Carriers  for  Modesto  and 
Stockton, CA included the following statement regarding fuel cost adjustments: 4 

‘‘The  attached  schedule  should  be  submitted  by  Air  Chaparral  along  with  each 
subsidy  billing.  The  carrier  should  also  submit  a  schedule  indicating  total  cost 
and total gallons used in Stockton and Modesto service for the same billing peri-
ods  so  that  the  actual  cost  per  gallon  can  be  verified.  Once  the  actual  cumu-
lative  fuel  cost  exceeds  the  cumulative  fuel  cost  paid  for  by  the  mileage  rate, 
the  Board’s  Air  Carrier  Subsidy  Need  Division  will  arrange  reimbursement  for 
85  percent  of  the  difference.  In  the  event  that  the  actual  cost  does  not  exceed 
that  provided  for  in  the  rate,  an  appropriate  adjustment  reflecting  85  percent 
of  the  difference  will  be  made  to  Air  Chaparral’s  rate  in  the  last  payment  of 
the first and/or second year.’’ 

Following the tragic events of 9/11, the DOT once again reimbursed EAS carriers 
for  significant  cost  increases.  When  expressing  their  concern  regarding  increased 
costs  on  EAS  carriers,  the  impact  on  participating  EAS  carriers,  and  what  would 
occur should EAS carriers continue to leave the program the Department stated: 

‘‘. . .  those  carriers  that  participate  in  the  EAS  program  do  not  have  the  flexi-
bility  as  non-EAS  airlines  to  adjust  their  systems  to  reflect  the  shifts  in  costs, 
revenue,  and  traffic.  Because  they  remain  under  contract  with  the  Department 
to provide a prescribed level of service at EAS communities, they have very lit-
tle  ability  to  eliminate  service  on  unprofitable  routes,  reduce  frequencies, 
downsize aircraft, or contract out flight operations in order to reduce loses. . . . 
In absence of some immediate reflection of the financial consequences stemming 
from  the  events  of  September  11th  into  these  carrier’s  contracts,  we  estimate 
that  some  could  be  forced  to  cease  operations,  thereby  vitiating  the  program 
itself.  If  this  were  to  occur,  scores  of  small,  isolated  communities  could  lose  all 
their  air  service.  Moreover,  the  loss  of  service  could  be  permanent  for  almost 
all of these communities, as the pool of potential replacement carriers has dras-
tically declined owing to their transition to larger equipment and to service only 
in large markets.’’ 5 

By  the  DOT’s  own  admission,  they  have  demonstrated  a  complete  understanding 
of  the  problem  but  are  now  electing  to  ignore  their  own  observations,  when  they 

4 The  CAB  also  included  in  Order  82–5–130  a  schedule  to  be  completed  by  the  EAS  carrier 
providing  detailed  information  on:  billed  available  miles,  gallons  of  fuel  used  per  month,  actual 
cost  per  gallon,  rate  cost  per  gallon,  monthly  fuel  costs,  and  cumulative  fuel  costs  in  order  for 
the carrier to receive compensation for increases in jet fuel prices. 

5 DOT Order 2002–2–13. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

46 

have both the legislative and financial tools to address funding fuel cost adjustment 
provisions in Vision 100. 

Lastly, today, on behalf of the United States Postal Service (USPS), the DOT has 
established  a  mechanism  by  which  subsidized  carriers  delivering  passengers  and 
mail under the Alaska Mainline and Bush Mail Program receive quarterly fuel cost 
adjustments. It is no less equitable for carriers who provide vital air transportation 
to  small  communities  in  the  lower  48  states  to  be  compensated  for  adjustments  in 
fuel  costs  for  which  they  have  no  control  than  it  is  fair,  equitable  and  just  for  air 
service providers in Alaska. 
Where Do We Go From Here? 

The  future  of  commercial  air  service  to  small,  rural  communities  unfortunately 
does  not  look  promising,  that  is  unless  Congress  acts  immediately  to  properly  ad-
dress the matter of mitigating risks to air carriers via fuel cost adjustments. Should 
Congress choose not to act and the status quo be allowed to continue, it is our firm 
belief that within a short period of time there will be less than a handful of carriers 
left  in  the  program.  Under  such  a  scenario,  Congress  can  certainly  expect  subsidy 
rates to increase due to little or no competition for individual markets while commu-
nities may become increasingly dissatisfied with the level and quality of air service 
but will have no recourse as there are no other air carriers to turn to. 

The  EAS  program  was  established  to  protect  small,  rural  communities  after  de-
regulation. Congress recognized that the benefits of commercial air service must not 
be limited only to those in large, urban areas of the country. However, the program 
will be hard pressed to continue without the active participation of financially stable 
carriers willing to serve small communities. 

To avoid what will otherwise prove to be a disastrous situation for small commu-
nities,  Congress  must  include  language  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  FAA  Reauthoriza-
tion  bill  which  changes  the  formula  by  which  carriers  can  apply  for  and  receive  re-
lief  under  Section  402  to  focus  on  increases  in  jet  fuel  costs,  not  total  unit  cost  in-
creases  and  Congress  must  also  require  the  DOT  to  implement  this  vital  provision 
of the law. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV 

TO HON. ANDREW B. STEINBERG 

Question 1. Your testimony appears to be predicated on reducing the Federal Gov-
ernment’s financial obligation to small community air service programs. I know that 
inadequate  and  unreliable  service  and  the  use  of  small  turboprop  aircraft  are  two 
reasons  why  a  lot  of  people  do  not  what  to  fly  from  EAS  communities.  Three  West 
Virginia  communities  (Parkersburg,  Clarksburg,  and  Morgantown)  have  faced  a  se-
rious  decline  in  traffic  due  to  terrible  service  from  the  EAS  carrier.  DOT  has  since 
rectified that situation, but it will take years for these communities to recover. Has 
the  DOT  ever  examined  the  impact  of  providing  substantially  more  in  resources  to 
the  program  so  that  air  service  would  be  provided  on  larger  aircraft  with  more  fre-
quent service? 

Answer. We do not think this would be a wise course of action. As you know, the 
typical  EAS  flight  is  operated  with  19-seat  aircraft.  There  have  been  a  few  situa-
tions  where  the  Department  has  authorized  additional  subsidy  for  communities  to 
receive  service  with  larger  aircraft,  including  at  the  three  communities  that  you 
mention. In that case, we authorized a half million dollars more for 30-seat aircraft, 
which  the  communities  favored  instead  of  the  19-seat  option.  There  are  a  few  com-
munities where larger (30-seat) aircraft could operate successfully. 

For  the  most  part,  even  19-seaters  are  probably  too  big.  The  average  subsidized 
EAS  community  generates  6–7  passengers  a  flight,  resulting  in  the  planes  being 
only  about  35  percent  full,  and  many  communities  generate  far  fewer  passengers 
than  that.  About  30  communities  average  fewer  than  10  enplanements  a  day.  In 
those  cases,  larger  aircraft  or  additional  frequencies  are  clearly  not  warranted.  In-
deed,  if  larger  aircraft  became  the  norm,  the  subsidy  per  passenger  might  end  up 
exceeding the $200 statutory cap, as airline operating expenses would go up. 

Question  2.  You  state  in  your  testimony  that  the  EAS  demonstration  programs 
that  Senator  Lott  and  I  included  in  the  2003  FAA  bill  have  been  largely  unused. 
You do not have a clear reason why. Could you please explain how the DOT imple-
mented  these  programs?  Did  you  one  issue  a  Federal  Register  notice?  Or  did  you 
work with various aviation associations and local government groups to find commu-
nities that may have benefited from them? 

Answer.  One  of  the  pilot  programs  to  which  you  refer  is  the  Community  Flexi-
bility  Pilot  Program,  which  allows  up  to  ten  communities  to  receive  a  grant  equal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

47 

to  2  years’  worth  of  subsidy  in  exchange  for  their  forgoing  their  EAS  for  10  years. 
The  other  is  the  Alternate  Essential  Air  Service  Program  under  which,  instead  of 
paying  an  air  carrier  to  serve  a  community  as  we  typically  do  under  EAS,  commu-
nities  could  apply  to  receive  the  funds  directly  to  implement  a  plan  that  they  have 
developed. 

In  the  summer  of  2004,  the  Department  issued  separate  orders  establishing  both 
programs, and published them in the Federal Register as well. In addition, the pro-
grams were covered in the usual trade journals. While we received a few phone calls 
asking  for  information,  no  communities  have  applied.  In  the  case  of  the  Flexibility 
pilot program, a community would have to forego 10 years of guaranteed air service 
for  funds  that  would  equal  just  2  years  of  the  cost  of  EAS.  Most  communities  evi-
dently  would  rather  retain  scheduled  air  service  for  10  years  rather  than  money  to 
improve their airport’s ability to handle general aviation flights. With respect to the 
Alternate  program,  we  believe  that  some  communities  are  resistant  to  risk  and 
change. 

Question  3.  I  have  heard  from  my  airports  and  constituents  that  one  of  the  rea-
sons passengers do not use airports with EAS service is because that service is often 
very unreliable. As you know, these communities only have three flights a day, and 
even if one flight is canceled, it causes significant disruptions for passengers. Unreli-
able  service  also  makes  it  difficult  for  communities  to  develop  a  passenger  loyalty 
for  using  a  facility.  Does  the  DOT  monitor  the  reliability  and  on-time  performance 
of  air  carriers  who  provide  essential  air  service?  Does  DOT  require  a  certain  level 
of  performance  from  these  carriers?  Does  DOT  sanction  carriers  who  are  not  pro-
viding the level of service as required by the government contract? 

Answer.  Reliable  service  is  obviously  important  for  any  service  to  be  successful. 
When  the  EAS  program  was  set  up  at  the  Civil  Aeronautics  Board  in  1978,  care 
was  taken  to  put  incentives  in  place  to  encourage  reliable  services.  Among  those 
that remain in effect today is the ‘‘no fly-no pay’’ policy. That is, carriers must oper-
ate the flight in conformance with the contract in order to receive the compensation. 
(There is a small exception for safety reasons in the case of weather conditions that 
are marginal and the pilot in command elects to overfly the community even though 
conditions may be legal.) 

We  have  debated  penalizing  carriers  for  late  flights,  but  that  is  a  ‘‘double-edged 
sword.’’ On the one hand, it would seem to create an incentive for carriers to operate 
their  flights  on  time.  On  the  other  hand,  if  the  EAS  carrier  lost  part  of  its  subsidy 
it might cancel the flight altogether—raising the question as to whether a late flight 
is  better  than  no  flight.  In  addition,  many  delays  are  not  the  fault  of  the  EAS  car-
riers. (For example, EAS flights are more likely to be ground held at the EAS com-
munity  if  the  connecting  hub  is  backed  up  due  to  ATC  delays  because  they  tend  to 
be  short-haul  flights,  which  are  the  first  to  be  grounded.)  In  those  situations,  it 
would seem unfair to penalize the EAS carrier. 

From  a  broader  perspective,  we  have  all  too  few  carriers  willing  to  participate  in 

the EAS program, and further penalties could only exacerbate that situation. 

Question 4. What effects would result from changes in the EAS per passenger sub-
sidy cap, either increasing or restricting it in some cases? How would these changes 
affect the EAS program as a whole? 

Answer. Increasing the subsidy-per-passenger cap or having it apply to fewer com-
munities would result in having more communities in the program for a longer time 
and  raising  the  costs  of  the  program,  which  is  why  the  Department  has  opposed 
such proposed changes. Given airfare levels, and just generally, $200 per passenger 
per  one-way  flight  is  still  a  significant  sum  for  a  Federal  operating  subsidy  (the 
round  trip  subsidy  for  a  passenger  can  be  nearly  $400).  Reducing  the  level  of  the 
cap  or  having  it  apply  to  more  communities  would  help  keep  the  costs  of  the  pro-
gram in check. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV TO 

HON. KAREN MILLER 

Question.  In  testimony  at  an  earlier  hearing  on  this  issue,  the  Government  Ac-
countability  Office  suggested  DOT  provide  Essential  Air  Service  funding  directly  to 
communities so that they would have the flexibility to secure the air service options 
that  best  fit  their  needs.  What  do  you  think  of  this  idea?  Do  you  believe  that  most 
small communities would be able to negotiate with carriers to develop more flexible 
air service plans? 

Answer.  I  think  that  could  be  an  option  for  those  EAS  communities  that  believe 
they  have  the  expertise  and  legal  capacity  to  negotiate  an  agreement  with  an  air 
carrier.  One  area  that  communities  may  be  more  successful  in  negotiating  is  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

48 

relating  to  performance  or  reliability  provisions.  Finally,  we  think  it  would  be  im-
portant that even if a community opted to negotiate with an air carrier, the commu-
nity  would  have  the  additional  option  in  the  case  of  an  impasse  of  agreeing  to  let 
USDOT complete the negotiations. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV TO 

MARK F. COURTNEY, A.A.E. 

Question.  In  testimony  at  an  earlier  hearing  on  this  issue,  the  Government  Ac-
countability  Office  suggested  DOT  provide  Essential  Air  Service  funding  directly  to 
communities so that they would have the flexibility to secure the air service options 
that  best  fit  their  needs.  What  do  you  think  of  this  idea?  Do  you  believe  that  most 
small communities would be able to negotiate with carriers to develop more flexible 
air service plans? 

Answer. As a non-hub airport serving approximately 120,000 passengers per year, 
Lynchburg  Regional  Airport  does  not  qualify  for  DOT  funding  under  the  Essential 
Air  Service  Program,  and  as  such  does  not  have  a  position  on  this  specific  issue. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV TO 

FAYE MALARKEY 

Question.  Do  you  think  these  technological  advances  will  lower  air  service  costs 
to  the  extent  that  it  will  actually  be  economically  feasible,  if  not  profitable,  for  re-
gional  airlines  to  provide  service  to  small  communities  without  EAS  subsidies?  Do 
you think that requiring large airlines to code-share on EAS flights would help im-
prove air service to small communities? 
Answer. (Witness Failed to Respond). 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:37 Aug 22, 2012 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75608.TXT JACKIE

